 






Monday


March 14, 1994





Part III


Department of Health and Human Services





Food and Drug Administration





21 CFR Parts 203 and 205
Prescription Drugs, Policies, Requirements and Administrative 
Procedures; Proposed Rule 









Federal Register

/Vol. 59, No. 49/Monday, March 14, 
1994/Proposed Rules 











<USDEPT>DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES</USDEPT>



<USBUREAU>Food and Drug Administration</USBUREAU>



<CFRNO>21 CFR Parts 203 and 205</CFRNO>



<RINDOCK>[Docket No. 92N0297]</RINDOCK>



<RINDOCK>RIN 0905AC81 </RINDOCK>


Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987; Prescription Drug Amendments of 1992; Policies, Requirements, and Administrative
Procedures


<AGENCY>
AGENCY: 

Food and Drug Administration, HHS.


</AGENCY>
<ACTION>
ACTION: 

Proposed rule. 



</ACTION>
<SUMMARY>
SUMMARY: 

The Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is issuing a proposed rule to set forth agency policies and requirements and
to provide administrative procedures, information, and guidance for those sections of the Prescription Drug Marketing
Act of 1987 (PDMA), as modified by the Prescription Drug Amendments of 1992 (PDA), that were not implemented by the
final rule that set forth Federal guidelines for State licensing of wholesale drug distributors (55 FR 38012, September
14, 1990). FDA is also proposing to amend the definitions section of the State licensing guidelines to make the definition
of ``wholesale distribution'' consistent with that in this proposed regulation.


</SUMMARY>
<DATE>
DATES: 

Written comments by May 30, 1994.


</DATE>
<ADDRESS>
ADDRESSES: 

Written comments to the Dockets Management Branch (HFA305), Food and Drug Administration, rm. 123,
12420 Parklawn Dr., Rockville, MD 20857.


</ADDRESS>
<FURTHER>
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: 

Richard L. Arkin, Center for Drug Evaluation and Research (HFD362), Food and Drug Administration, 7500 Standish
Pl., Rockville, MD 20855, 3015941046.

</FURTHER>
<SUPPLEM>
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:




Table of Contents


I. Background
II. Description of the Proposed Rule


A. Scope
B. Reimportation
C. Sales Restrictions
D. Samples
E. Wholesale Distribution
F. Request and Receipt Forms, Reports, and Records
G. Penalties and Rewards
H. Technical Amendment to State Licensing Guideline


III. Economic Analysis
IV. Executive Order 12612: Federalism
V. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 
VI. Environmental Impact
VII. Request for Comments


I. Background


On April 22, 1988, the President signed PDMA into law (Pub. L. 100293). According to the congressional findings
that were made part of the text of PDMA as section 2, the legislation was intended to ensure that drug products purchased
by consumers would be safe and effective and to avoid an unacceptable risk that counterfeit, adulterated, misbranded,
subpotent, or expired drugs were being sold to American consumers. (See sec. 2(8), PDMA.) 
Congress found, among other things, that legislation was necessary because there were insufficient safeguards
in the drug distribution system to prevent the introduction and retail sale of substandard, ineffective, or counterfeit
drugs, and that a wholesale drug diversion submarket had developed that prevented effective control over, or even
routine knowledge of, the true sources of drugs. (See secs. 2(2) and 2(3), PDMA.)
Congress found that large amounts of drugs had been reimported into the United States as American goods returned,
causing a health and safety risk to American consumers because the drugs may have become subpotent or adulterated
during foreign handling and shipping. Congress also found that a ready market for prescription drug reimports had
been the catalyst for a continuing series of frauds against American manufacturers and had provided the cover for
the importation of foreign counterfeit drugs. (See sec. 2(4), PDMA.)
The congressional findings stated that the then-existing system of providing drug samples to physicians through
manufacturers' representatives had been abused for decades and had resulted in the sale to consumers of misbranded,
expired, and adulterated pharmaceuticals. (See sec. 2(6), PDMA.)
According to the congressional findings, the bulk resale of below-wholesale-priced prescription drugs by health
care entities for ultimate sale at retail helped to fuel the diversion market and was an unfair form of competition
to wholesalers and retailers who had to pay otherwise prevailing market prices. (See sec. 2(7), PDMA.)
PDMA amends sections 301, 303, 503, and 801 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (the act) (21 U.S.C. 331, 333,
353, 381) to: (1) Ban the reimportation of prescription human drugs produced in the United States, except when reimported
by the manufacturer or under FDA authorization for emergency medical care; (2) ban the sale, purchase, or trade, or
the offer to sell, purchase, or trade, of any drug sample; (3) ban the sale, purchase, or trade, or the offer to sell,
purchase, or trade, or counterfeit any drug coupon; (4) establish limits on the distribution of drug samples to practitioners
licensed to prescribe such drugs or to pharmacies of hospitals or other health care entities, including a requirement
that such distributions occur only at the request of a licensed practitioner; (5) require licensed practitioners
to request samples in writing; (6) mandate storage, handling, and recordkeeping requirements for drug samples;
(7) prohibit, with certain exceptions, the sale, purchase, or trade, or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade, of prescription
human drugs that were purchased by hospitals or other health care entities, or which were donated or supplied at a reduced
price to a charitable organization; (8) require State licensing of wholesale distributors of prescription drugs
under Federal guidelines that include minimum standards for storage, handling, and recordkeeping; (9) require
unauthorized wholesale distributors to provide to each wholesale distributor a statement identifying each sale
of the drug before the sale to such wholesale distributor; and (10) set forth civil and criminal penalties for violations
of these provisions.
Most PDMA provisions became effective July 22, 1988. However, the drug sample distribution requirements (section
503(d) of the act (21 U.S.C. 353(d))) became effective on October 20, 1988, and the requirement for State licensure
of wholesale distributors (section 503(e)(2) of the act) became effective on September 15, 1992 (2 years after the
adoption of final rules by the agency setting standards for State licensing). In the 

Federal Register

 of September 13, 1988 (53 FR 35325), FDA published proposed State licensing guidelines to implement that part of PDMA.
FDA received approximately 50 comments on the proposal. These comments were made part of a public docket (Docket No.
88N0258), which is available for inspection at FDA's Dockets Management Branch (address above). After considering
all the comments received on the proposed rule, FDA published revised State licensing guidelines as a final rule (21
CFR part 205) in the 

Federal Register

 of September 14, 1990 (55 FR 38012). That rule includes minimum requirements for storage and handling of prescription
drugs and for establishment and maintenance of records of drug distribution. 
The PDMA State licensing requirements were modified by the enactment of PDA (Pub. L. 102353, 106 Stat. 941)
on August 26, 1992. Among other things, PDA amended section 503(e) of the act to establish a temporary Federal wholesale
distributor registration procedure for wholesale drug distributors in those States that do not have a licensing
program that meets the Federal guidelines. On September 3, 1992, FDA issued a letter to industry and other interested
persons providing information and guidance on the procedure to be followed by wholesale distributors required to
register under the procedure established by PDA. 
PDA also recast other parts of PDMA. Among other things, PDA: (1) Amended section 303(b)(1) of the act to establish
a scienter requirement (``knowingly'') for conviction of violations of certain prohibited acts under section 301(t)
of the act relating to reimportation (section 801(d)(1) of the act), samples (section 503(c)(1) of the act), coupons
(503(c)(2) of the act), and unlicensed wholesale distributors (section 503(e)(2)(A) of the act); (2) amended section
503(d) of the act to prohibit the distribution of drug samples by anyone other than the manufacturer or authorized
distributors of record, except that Congress excluded from the term ``distribute'' the provision of a drug sample
to a patient by a licensed practitioner, health care professional acting at the direction and under the supervision
of such a practitioner, and a hospital or health care entity pharmacy acting at the direction of such a practitioner;
(3) amended section 503(d)(2) and (d)(3) of the act to disallow any distribution of drug samples by unauthorized distributors;
(4) amended section 503(e)(1) of the act to require that unauthorized distributors provide a statement of origin
identifying all prior sales, purchases, or trades of such drugs and the names and addresses of the parties to the transactions
to all recipients; and (5) made certain conforming and technical changes to the statute. 
On August 1 and November 3, 1988, and January 26, 1990, FDA issued letters to the regulated industry and other interested
persons providing information and guidance on those aspects of PDMA that were not implemented by the State licensing
rule. The letters requested suggestions from the public regarding the drafting of regulations. Suggestions from
the public have been made part of a public docket (Docket No. 88N258L), which is also available for inspection
at FDA's Dockets Management Branch (address above). The agency has received requests for the issuance of further
guidance letters to provide specific information in certain areas or to answer particular questions. However, FDA
believes that it is now appropriate to establish definitive requirements through notice and comment rulemaking.

In drafting this proposed rule, the agency considered the comments submitted to Docket Nos. 88N0258 and 88N258L,
including suggestions received in response to FDA's three guidance letters, pertinent comments received in response
to the proposed rule on State licensing of wholesale distributors, and other written submissions. 


II. Description of the Proposed Rule


FDA is proposing to add a new part 203 to set forth agency policies and requirements and to provide administrative procedures,
information, and guidance for those sections of PDMA that were not implemented by part 205. FDA is also proposing to
amend 205.3 to make the definition of ``wholesale distribution'' consistent with that in proposed part 203.

A summary of the provisions of proposed part 203 follows:


A. Scope


1. General


It was intended that PDMA would protect the public against the threat of subpotent, adulterated, counterfeit, and
misbranded drugs posed by the existence of drug diversion schemes and a drug diversion submarket, and the absence
of appropriate controls over and creation and maintenance of appropriate records regarding the distribution of
prescription drugs. 
Accordingly, the scope of the proposed rule, as set forth in proposed 203.1, includes establishment of procedures
and requirements pertaining to the reimportation and wholesale distribution of prescription drugs; the sale, purchase,
or trade (or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade) of prescription drugs by hospitals, health care entities, and charitable
institutions; and the distribution of prescription drug samples.


2. Bulk Drugs


Some questions have been raised about the applicability of PDMA to bulk drugs. The statutory language of PDMA encompasses
all drugs subject to section 503(b) of the act within its scope. 
The legislative history (``Report of the Committee on Energy and Commerce,'' H. Rept. 10076, April 30, 1987,
and ``Report of the Committee on Finance,'' S. Rept. 100202, March 18, 1988) or the congressional hearing record
do not suggest that bulk drug substances be treated any differently from other prescription drugs. Bulk drug substances
are susceptible to the same problems of lack of accountability and diversion that this legislation was intended to
remedy. It is clear that applying the provisions of the statute to bulk drug substances would help protect against
the abuses that Congress intended to address and contribute to the protection of the public health. Accordingly,
bulk drug substances are, as drugs within the meaning of section 503(b) of the act, expressly brought within the scope
of PDMA and these implementing regulations. 


3. Biological Products


Questions have also been raised about the applicability of PDMA to biological products, even though the statutory
language of PDMA encompasses all drugs subject to section 503(b) of the act.
There is nothing in the legislative history or the congressional hearing record to suggest that biological products
that are prescription drugs under section 503(b) of the act should be treated differently from other prescription
drugs. Biological products, except for blood and blood components intended for transfusion, are susceptible to
the same problems of lack of accountability and diversion that this legislation was intended to remedy. It is clear
that applying the provisions of the statute to biological products, except for blood and blood components intended
for transfusion, or biological products which are also medical devices, would help protect against the abuses that
Congress intended to address and contribute to the protection of the public health. Accordingly, biological products
that are prescription drugs under section 503(b) of the act, except for blood and blood components intended for transfusion,
fall under the scope of PDMA and are expressly included in these implementing regulations. 


4. Blood and Blood Components Intended for Transfusion


Since passage of PDMA, a number of persons have presented to FDA issues posed by the application of PDMA to the distribution
and sale of blood and blood components intended for transfusion by blood establishments and hospitals. Two comments
to the agency requested clarification of PDMA's scope and urged FDA to exempt blood establishments from all of PDMA's
provisions. The comments contended that licensing blood distributors as wholesalers would seriously disrupt the
Nation's blood services. A third comment suggested that the agency could, by notice and comment rulemaking, exempt
blood and blood components from PDMA by declaring that they are not prescription drugs for PDMA purposes.
PDMA, by its literal terms, applies to all drugs that are subject to section 503(b) of the act; that is, to all human prescription
drugs, including biological products. There is no doubt that blood and blood components intended for transfusion
are prescription drugs. (See 21 CFR 606.121(c)(8)(i) and 610.61(s). See also 47 FR 22518, May 25, 1982; 46 FR 40212,
August 7, 1981.) However, if PDMA were considered applicable to the distribution of blood and blood components, the
result would be to impede the existing blood distribution system, thereby interfering with our Nation's blood supply.
Because application of PDMA to blood and blood components would produce this untenable result, FDA believes that
Congress could not have intended to subject blood and blood components to PDMA's provisions. 
Moreover, the legislative history lacks any discussion of PDMA's application to blood and blood components and also
clearly shows that Congress intended that PDMA remedy problems associated with the distribution of those drugs that
are popularly referred to as ``medicines'' or ``pharmaceuticals.'' (See Pub. L. 100293, sec. 2 (1988) (``Report
of the Committee on Energy and Commerce,'' H. Rept. 10076, April 30, 1987, and ``Report of the Committee on Finance,''
S. Rept. 100202, March 18, 1988).) Blood and blood components are unique drug products that are distributed
in an entirely different way from other prescription drugs. FDA believes that the fact that blood and blood components
are not part of the system of distribution and marketing that Congress intended to regulate under the terms of PDMA
further signals that Congress could not have intended to include blood and blood components within the scope of the
licensing requirement. 
Accordingly, FDA has taken a number of actions to clarify the scope of PDMA to prescription drugs other than blood and
blood components intended for transfusion. In the final State licensing guideline rule (55 FR 38012 at 38024), FDA
specifically excluded from the definition of ``wholesale distribution'' the sale, purchase, or trade of blood and
blood components intended for transfusion (see 205.3(f)(8)). At the same time, FDA published another proposed
rule, ``Applicability to Blood and Blood Components Intended for Transfusion; Guidelines for State Licensing of
Wholesale Prescription Drug Distributors'' (55 FR 38027, September 14, 1990), asking for comments on the exclusion
of blood and blood components intended for transfusion from the PDMA State licensing guidelines. 
After considering the comments received and reviewing PDMA's purpose and its legislative history, FDA has tentatively
concluded that PDMA is not intended to apply to blood and blood components intended for transfusion. Accordingly,
at 203.1 the proposed rule would exclude blood and blood components intended for transfusion from the requirements
of and the restrictions in PDMA and also adds specific language at 203.22(g) excluding blood and blood components
intended for transfusion from the PDMA sales restrictions. 


5. Oxygen


Questions have also been raised about the applicability of PDMA to the drug oxygen, U.S.P. (U.S. Pharmacopeia). FDA
advises that oxygen, U.S.P., is a prescription drug subject to section 503(b) of the act, and, therefore, within the
scope of PDMA and these proposed regulations.


B. Reimportation


Section 801(d) of the act (21 U.S.C. 381(d)) provides that a prescription drug that is manufactured in a State and exported
may not be reimported into the United States unless it is imported by the manufacturer, except when authorized by the
Secretary of Health and Human Services for emergency medical care. The delegation of authority provisions at 21 CFR
5.10 redelegate the functions of the Secretary to the Commissioner of Food and Drugs. 
Section 801(d) of the act responds to a finding that large amounts of drugs were being reimported into the United States
as ``American Goods Returned,'' and that these imports posed a health and safety risk to American consumers because
they could become subpotent or adulterated during foreign handling and shipping. (See sec. 2(4), PDMA.)
The congressional findings also acknowledged that what was termed ``the ready market for prescription drug reimports''
was ``the catalyst for a continuing series of frauds against American manufacturers and has provided the cover for
the importation of foreign counterfeit drugs.'' (See sec. 2(5), PDMA.)


1. Restrictions on Reimportation


Proposed 203.10 sets forth the restriction that no prescription drug manufactured in a State and exported
from the United States may be reimported by anyone other than its manufacturer, except that FDA may grant permission
to a person other than the manufacturer to reimport a prescription drug if it deems such reimportation is required
for emergency medical care. 


2. Defining ``Manufacturer''


FDA defined the term ``manufacturer'' in the PDMA State licensing regulation to mean anyone engaged in manufacturing,
preparing, propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging, or labeling of a prescription drug
(205.3(d)). This definition is somewhat more inclusive than the definition used earlier by the agency in the
labeling provisions at 201.1 (21 CFR 201.1). The definition in 201.1(b) states that the manufacturer
is the person who performs all of the following operations that are required to produce the product: (1) Mixing, (2)
granulating, (3) milling, (4) molding, (5) lyophilizing, (6) tableting, (7) encapsulating, (8) coating, (9) sterilizing,
and (10) filling sterile, aerosol, or gaseous drugs into dispensing containers; or at least some of the operations
if the labeling indicates the presence of other manufacturers. Under 201.1, a packer or distributor is not
the same as a manufacturer.
FDA concluded that the more inclusive definition of ``manufacturer'' was consistent with the intent of the statute
in imposing the requirement for State licensing of wholesale drug distributors; however, the agency has preliminarily
concluded that a less inclusive definition of that term would be more consistent with the intent of the remaining sections
of PDMA. For example, the statutory provision against reimportation by persons other than the manufacturer (except
when permission is granted by FDA) is intended to establish accountability in reimportations so that adulterated
and/or misbranded goods do not reenter commercial channels in the United States. The reimportation provision is
based on the assumption that a manufacturer, in the less inclusive sense, is the person most knowledgeable about the
product's characteristics; is the most capable of determining that the product meets the stability, quality, and
purity standards it is represented to possess; and is the only person capable of authenticating the basic integrity
of the product.
The remaining sections of PDMA are consistent with the less inclusive definition of ``manufacturer'' in 201.1,
rather than the more inclusive definition in 205.3(d). Accordingly, proposed 203.3(p) proposes to
adopt the definition of ``manufacturer'' in 201.1 for this rule.


3. Applications for Reimportation to Provide Emergency Medical Care
Proposed 203.11 provides an administrative procedure by which applications may be made by a person other than
the manufacturer for the reimportation of prescription drugs for emergency medical care. The proposal would codify
the current procedure whereby applications for reimportation are submitted to the Director of the FDA District Office
in the district where reimportation is sought. The District Office would review and approve or disapprove each application.
4. An Appeal From an Adverse Decision by the District Office


Proposed 203.12 would also codify the current procedure that permits an appeal from an adverse decision by
the district office to be made to the Office of Compliance (HFD300), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research,
for prescription human drugs other than biological products. An appeal from an adverse decision involving human
prescription biological products is to be made to the Office of Compliance (HFM600), Center for Biologics
Evaluation and Research.


C. Sales Restrictions


Section 503(c)(3) of the act prohibits, with certain exceptions, the sale, purchase, or trade (or any offer to sell,
purchase, or trade) of any prescription drug that was purchased by a public or private hospital or other health care
entity, or donated or supplied at a reduced price to a charitable organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1954. 


1. Defining ``Charitable Organization''


Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code generally exempts from income taxes not-for-profit organizations
that operate for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, educational, and public safety purposes. However,
such exemptions are not automatic. Under 26 CFR 1.501, a charitable organization must apply for and be granted tax-exempt
status. Tax-exempt status may be revoked and the organization may lose its exemption if it fails to meet the requirements
of the statute and regulations. 
It is FDA's view that an organization can be accurately described as one fitting the requirements of section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code only if it has been granted tax-exempt status by the Department of the Treasury. Accordingly,
FDA proposes to define the term ``charitable organization'' in proposed 203.3(f) as a nonprofit hospital,
health care entity, organization, institution, foundation, association, or corporation that has been granted
an exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended. 


2. Restrictions and Exclusions


Proposed 203.20 restates the statutory restrictions on prescription drug sales by hospitals, health care
entities, and charitable institutions (section 503(c)(3) of the act). These restrictions reflect a congressional
finding that the resale of prescription drugs by health care entities at below wholesale prices had helped to fuel
the drug diversion market and that such sales constituted an unfair form of competition to legitimate wholesalers
and retailers paying the prevailing market prices. (See sec. 2(7), PDMA.)
The statute does not distinguish sales made at the average wholesale price (AWP) and those made at below AWP or at more
than the AWP. The sales restrictions apply to all sales, purchases, or trades by hospitals, health care entities,
and charitable institutions. Sales of any human prescription drugs purchased by a hospital or other health care entity,
or donated or supplied at reduced cost to a charitable institution, are prohibited unless excepted by section 503(c)(3)(B)
of the act or exempted under proposed 203.22, 203.23, or 203.24. 
In its findings, Congress stated that it believed that these resales had helped to create an unacceptable risk that
counterfeit, adulterated, misbranded, subpotent, or expired drugs would be sold to American consumers. (See sec.
2(8), PDMA.)
a. 

Hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution cannot be wholesaler

. FDA has learned that some hospitals and health care entities, including physicians, have obtained licenses as wholesale
distributors in an effort to circumvent the statutory restrictions against the sale of prescription drugs by hospitals,
health care entities, and charitable institutions. Those hospitals and health care entities that have secured wholesale
drug distributor licenses claim that the statutory restrictions are made inapplicable to them by the first clause
of the last sentence of section 503(c)(3) of the act, which reads: ``For purposes of this paragraph, the term `entity'
does not include a wholesale distributor of drugs or a retail pharmacy licensed under State law * * *.''
Such a reading is inconsistent not only with general rules of statutory construction, but with the intent of Congress
as reflected in the legislative history. The legislative history, which addresses Congress' concern about donations
to charitable institutions and institutional discounts for hospitals and health care entities, notes that some
of these institutions had been sources of unfair competition and drug diversion, and explains that the statutory
prohibition against the sale of drugs donated to or acquired at reduced price by charitable institutions or purchased
by hospitals or health care entities is directed at preventing unfair profits through resales of such drugs. Congress
said: 


Section 503(c)(3) would prohibit resales of pharmaceuticals by hospitals and other health care entities or charitable
organizations with certain exceptions. This provision is intended to cover resales by both for profit and nonprofit
health care entities. These institutions typically receive discount prices, substantially below the average wholesale
price (AWP) for pharmaceuticals, based on their status as a health care entity or charity. When hospitals or other
health care entities obtain pharmaceuticals at favorable prices and then resell those drugs at a profit, they are
unfairly competing with wholesalers and retailers who cannot obtain such a favorable price. Such resales defraud
manufacturers, who are led to believe that the drugs are for the use of the health care entity. In any case, these resales
reward the unscrupulous and penalize the otherwise honest and efficient wholesaler or retailer while fueling the
diversion market. 



(H. Rept. 10076, pp. 1213.)



FDA interprets the first clause of the last sentence of section 503(c)(3) of the act to mean that the general prohibition
against drug sales by hospitals, health care entities, and charitable institutions was not intended to interfere
with the operations of legitimate licensed prescription drug wholesalers and retail pharmacies. Section 503(c)(3)
of the act does not open up a loophole for a hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution to avoid the statutory
prohibition against drug sales simply by obtaining a wholesaler license.
Accordingly, proposed 203.3(n) would state that a person cannot simultaneously be a ``health care entity''
and a retail pharmacy or wholesale distributor. The agency is also proposing to amend the State licensing guidelines
by adopting the same definition for ``health care entity'' at 205.3(h). 
If a charitable institution or a for-profit or nonprofit hospital or health care entity has a corporate for-profit
subsidiary that is a wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy, or if it is part of a group in which there is common control
over the hospital or health care entity and a wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy, then the charitable institution,
hospital, or health care entity would be prohibited under section 503(c)(3) of the act and proposed 203.20
and 203.22 from transferring any prescription drug donated or supplied at reduced price to the charitable institution
or purchased by the hospital or health care entity to the related wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy for further
sale except for a sale under a valid prescription or for emergency medical reasons.
A charitable institution, hospital, or health care entity that has a wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy subsidiary,
or one that is part of a group in which there is common control over the charitable institution, hospital, or health
care entity and a wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy, should maintain books and records that provide sufficient
audit trails to trace the purchase and sale of prescription drugs to ensure that no prescription drug donated or supplied
at reduced price to the charitable institution or purchased by the hospital or health care entity is transferred to
a related wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy for further sale except for a sale under a valid prescription or
for emergency medical reasons.
b. 

Statutory exclusions

. Proposed 203.22 restates the statutory exclusions to the sales restrictions. They are: (1) The purchase
or other acquisition of a drug for its own use by a hospital or other health care entity that is a member of a group purchasing
organization from the group purchasing organization or from other hospitals or health care entities that are members
of the organization; (2) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug by a charitable
organization to a nonprofit affiliate of the organization to the extent otherwise permitted by law; (3) the sale,
purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug among hospitals or other health care entities
that are under common control; (4) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug
for emergency medical reasons; or (5) the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug,
or the dispensing of a drug under a valid prescription.
c. 

Common control

. One statutory exclusion to the general prohibition against resale of drugs by hospitals, health care entities,
and charitable institutions permits the sale, purchase, or trade of prescription drugs among hospitals and health
care entities that are under common control. There is no statutory definition of the term ``common control,'' nor
is the term mentioned in the legislative history. 
The concept of common control can be found in other Federal regulatory schemes that were in use at the time PDMA was enacted
into law. Both the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Environmental Protection Agency define ``common control''
to mean possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person or an organization,
whether by ownership of stock, voting securities or rights, contract, or otherwise. (See 17 CFR 230.405 and 40 CFR
66.3(f).) FDA included this definition in the State licensing guidelines at 205.3(f)(4). This proposal would
adopt the same definition in proposed 203.3(g).
d. 

Sales for emergency medical reasons

. Section 503(c)(3) of the act permits the sale, purchase, or trade of prescription drugs by a hospital, health care
entity, or charitable institution for emergency medical reasons. The statute states that ``emergency medical reasons''
includes transfers of a drug between health care entities or from a health care entity to a retail pharmacy undertaken
to alleviate temporary shortages of the drug arising from delays in or interruptions of regular distribution schedules.
The statute does not further elaborate on the term ``emergency medical reasons.'' 
FDA believes that it may be useful to specify some of the circumstances in which a sale for emergency medical reasons
would be allowed. (See proposed 203.3(k).)
FDA received a significant number of comments from providers of emergency care, including emergency medical services,
ambulance corporations, fire companies, rescue squads, urgent care providers, emergency care physicians and technicians,
and State emergency care agencies and commissions that advised the agency that hospital pharmacies have traditionally
supplied drugs for emergency use by emergency medical services and licensed practitioners' offices operating in
the general service area of the hospital. Several comments stated that wholesale distributors are reluctant to open
small accounts to provide such drugs for emergency care, and that nearby hospital pharmacies are the logical providers.
Moreover, the comments noted that many States encourage hospitals to supply drugs for emergency use to emergency
medical services, and some States require emergency services to acquire their drugs exclusively from hospitals.

The proposal would allow sale of drugs by a hospital or health care entity to nearby emergency medical services such
as ambulance services, rescue squads, and fire companies in the same State or service or marketing area for use in emergency
treatment and to licensed practitioners for emergency office treatment. The proposal would also define emergency
medical reasons to allow hospitals and health care entities to provide minimal emergency supplies to nursing homes.

In contrast, FDA believes that the exception for emergency medical reasons does not permit hospitals or health care
entities regularly to sell to licensed practitioners prescription drugs that will be used for routine office procedures.
e. 

Government hospitals and health care entities

. Proposed 203.22(f) would also exclude the sale, purchase, or trade of prescription drugs by Federal, State,
and local government hospitals and health care entities to other Federal, State, and local government hospitals
or health care entities from the general prohibition against the sale, purchase, or trade of prescription drugs by
a hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution. 
Congress has established an extensive system of public hospitals and health care entities. These include hospitals,
clinics, and dispensaries operated for the military by the Department of Defense; hospitals and clinics operated
by the Veterans' Administration; and hospitals and clinics operated by the U.S. Public Health Service (including
Indian Health Service hospitals and clinics).
In addition, State and local governments have established public health hospitals, clinics, and dispensaries,
including drug treatment inpatient and outpatient facilities. These facilities operate under a variety of organizational
structures. They may be owned and operated by governmental entities, or be organized as private corporations or associations
under contract to State or local government agencies.
These health care entities may have interagency arrangements for the purchase and exchange of prescription drugs.
Such facilities operate because of Federal, State, or local governmental commitments to provide health care to particular
classes of patients in response to specific client needs. Among these needs are the provision of services to people
with low incomes, the distribution of vaccines, and the dispensing of antitoxins and blood derivatives in public
health emergencies. 
As noted, the adoption of the prohibition against sales by hospitals or health care entities was prompted in part because
of the differential pricing structure that permits purchases by hospitals and health care entities at below wholesale
prices and the resultant temptation to resell drugs so acquired at a profit. However, there is no financial incentive
for a Federal, State, or local government hospital or health care entity to sell prescription drugs purchased at below
wholesale prices because any profit from such a sale would go to the Federal or State treasury. Accordingly, FDA believes
that there is little likelihood that permitting Federal, State, or local government hospitals and health care entities
to sell prescription drugs to other Federal, State, or local government hospitals and health care entities would
lead to the kinds of abuses that PDMA was designed to end.
Therefore, proposed 203.22(f) would exclude such transactions from the general prohibition against resales
by hospitals and health care entities and thus permit Federal, State, or local government hospitals and health care
entities to sell drugs to other Federal, State, or local government hospitals and health care entities. 
FDA has been asked whether a State or local government agency, which, under a contract or memorandum of agreement,
sends or allows some of its patients to be treated at a private local clinic or other health care entity, may transfer
prescription drug products to such a facility to be dispensed to patients. In other words, would such a transfer violate
the prohibition against the sale, purchase, or trade of prescription drugs by a hospital, health care entity, or charitable
institution?
FDA advises that if a State or local government agency functions as or operates a hospital, health care entity, or charitable
institution, and a private health care entity is bound by a contractual agreement to the State or local government
agency, then the State or local government hospital or health care entity may sell prescription drugs to the contract
private health care entity provided that the prescription drugs sold are only used to serve government patients and
programs. The State or local government hospital or health care agency supplying the drug and the contract health
care entity would be obligated to implement appropriate controls to ensure that the drugs sold by the Government hospital
or health care entity to the contract health care entity are dispensed to patients in the Government program and not
diverted or sold to other patients or otherwise used for non-Government purposes. 
If the State or local government agency does not function as or operate a hospital, health care entity, or charitable
institution, and is acting as a prescription drug wholesaler, the prohibition against the sale of prescription drugs
by a hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution would not be applicable. 


3. Revocation of Acceptance, Reshipment, and Returns


FDA proposes to clarify the circumstances under which hospitals, health care entities, and charitable institutions
may, without violating section 503(c)(3) of the act, return or ship back prescription drugs to the manufacturer or
distributor from which they were purchased. 
In particular, proposed 203.23 and 203.24 would, respectively, describe the conditions by which hospitals,
health care entities, and charitable institutions may: (1) Revoke acceptance of any prescription drug received
because of an ordering or delivery mistake and ship them back to the manufacturer or distributor, and (2) return a drug
to the manufacturer or distributor.
A number of persons who submitted comments to the PDMA docket questioned the effect of the new statutory language on
commercial practice in the pharmaceutical industry. Several persons argued that the sales provisions in the Uniform
Commercial Code treat a sale as completed once a nondefective product has been ordered, delivered, and paid for, unless
specific contractual provisions make the sale conditional or revocable. Several persons urged that FDA view a return
for cash or credit after a completed sale as a new and prohibited sales transaction.
However, many other comments to the agency in the months after passage of PDMA observed that under common commercial
practice in the pharmaceutical industry, manufacturers and wholesale distributors permit returns and urged that
this practice be allowed to continue. FDA is aware that hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution pharmacies,
and distributors sometimes return products because of overstocks, changes in institutional formularies, the death
of a patient for whose use a drug product was acquired, or other reasons. The comments received by the agency argued
that to permit returns would both help to keep down the costs of medical care and reduce the risk that adulterated or
misbranded drugs would find their way into the diversion market.
FDA has tentatively concluded that it should, under specified conditions, allow drug products to be shipped back
or returned to the manufacturer or distributor, and this tentative conclusion is reflected in proposed 203.23
and 203.24. 
Under proposed 203.23, a hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution could revoke a sale and purchase
transaction because of a mistake in ordering or delivery and ship the prescription drug back, provided: (1) The hospital,
health care entity, or charitable institution ships the drug back within 10 working days of receipt; (2) the reshipment
is made under proper storage, handling, and shipping conditions; and (3) if reshipped to the wholesale distributor,
the hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution provides written notice to the manufacturer of the revocation
and reshipment. 
The proposal would require that the manufacturer be notified of the reshipment so that any chargebacks to the manufacturer
by the wholesale distributor or special price reduction credited by the manufacturer to the wholesale distributor
would be factored into the credit or refund given the distributor. This is intended to prevent windfall profits from
the return of a specially priced drug to the wholesale distributor. 
Under proposed 203.24, a hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution could return a product it
had purchased from a manufacturer or wholesale distributor, provided that: (1) The hospital, health care entity,
or charitable institution notifies the manufacturer that the prescription drug product has been returned to the
wholesale distributor; and (2) the hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution fills out a credit memo.
Proposed 203.24 would require the hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution to send a copy of
the credit memo to the manufacturer, for the same reasons that notification of the manufacturer is required in the
event of a revocation and reshipment, i.e., so that any chargebacks or reduced prices will be factored into any credit
or refund to prevent windfall profits from the transaction. 
Proposed 203.23 and 203.24 would both require detailed documentation to provide the kind of accountability
contemplated by the act to help ensure against diversion. To ensure that returned drugs remain safe and effective,
both proposed sections would require that drugs returned to a manufacturer or wholesale distributor be kept under
proper conditions for storage, handling, and shipping, and that written documentation reflecting the maintenance
of proper conditions be provided to the manufacturer or wholesale distributor to which the drugs are returned.
Under the proposal, the value of any credit, refund, or merchandise exchanged for the returned product could not exceed
the purchase price. 
For purposes of clarification and to ensure that the State licensing regulation and this proposed rule, when adopted,
are consistent, the agency is also proposing to amend the definitions in the State licensing guidelines at 205.3(f)
by adding two additional exceptions to ``wholesale distribution'' for the reshipment of drugs, when conducted in
accordance with 203.23, and drug returns, when conducted in accordance with 203.24.


D. Samples


To provide accountability and oversight in the sample distribution process, PDMA established in section 503(d)
of the act a strict system of controls over the distribution of prescription drug samples, which are defined in section
503(c)(1) of the act. Under the statutory scheme, no person could distribute any drug sample, except for a manufacturer
or distributor who distributed drug samples in accordance with specific requirements and in response to a written
request from a licensed practitioner. 
Under sections 503(d)(1) and (d)(2) of the act, both manufacturers and distributors could engage in sample distribution
if certain requirements were followed. However, section 4(2) of PDA further restricted the persons who can engage
in distribution of drug samples by amending section 503(d)(1) and (d)(2) of the act to restrict sample distributions
to manufacturers and authorized distributors of record. This amendment is demonstrative of the intent of Congress,
as reflected elsewhere in PDMA and PDA, to restrict the activities of drug distributors who are not authorized distributors
of record. Proposed 203.30, 203.31, and 203.33 through 203.39 are consistent with this amendment.
Under the revised statutory scheme, no person may distribute any drug sample, except for a manufacturer or authorized
distributor of record who distributes drug samples in accordance with specific requirements and in response to a
written request from a licensed practitioner. 
Section 503(d)(1) of the act states that, for purposes of this subsection, the term ``distribute'' does not include
the providing of a drug sample to a patient by a practitioner licensed to prescribe such drug, by a health care professional
acting at the direction and under the supervision of such a practitioner, or the pharmacy of a hospital or of another
health care entity acting at the direction of such a practitioner who received the drug sample in accordance with the
act and regulations. The definition of ``distribute'' in proposed 203.3(h) reflects this statutory exclusion.

PDMA sets up two different sample distribution systems, depending on the mode of delivery: (1) By mail or common carrier,
and (2) by means other than mail or common carrier, i.e., representative or detailer.
If a sample is delivered by mail or common carrier, the statute requires the recipient to execute a written receipt
when the drug sample is delivered and return the receipt to the manufacturer or authorized distributor of record from
which the drug sample was received. If the sample is delivered by a representative, a number of additional procedures
are required by the statute that pertain to storage and handling, inventories, recordkeeping, reporting of thefts
and significant losses, notification of convictions of representatives for drug sample violations, and accountability.
The statute specifies minimum requirements for the contents of written request forms and details certain recordkeeping
and reporting requirements.


1. Requirements for Drug Sample Distribution


The requirements for distribution of drug samples by manufacturers and authorized distributors of record by mail
or common carrier are set forth in proposed 203.30. The requirements for distribution of drug samples by representatives
are set forth in proposed 203.31. The proposed sections provide detailed requirements for written request
forms, receipts, and recordkeeping.
Most of these requirements are statutory; however, FDA has tentatively concluded that clarification of some of the
statutory requirements is desirable. FDA also has tentatively concluded that other requirements should be imposed
to help ensure smooth operation of the system, effective enforcement, effective accountability and oversight of
drug sample distribution, and provide adequate safeguards against drug sample diversion. 


2. Contents of the Sample Request Forms


Proposed 203.30 and 203.31 would require the written request form for drug samples to bear certain information:
(1) The name, address, professional title, signature of the practitioner making the request; (2) the practitioner's
State license number or the Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) identification number; (3) the proprietary or
established name and strength of the drug sample requested; (4) the quantity requested; (5) the name of the manufacturer
of the drug sample and the authorized distributor of record, if the drug sample is requested from a distributor; and
(6) the date of the request.
A number of comments suggested that it is sometimes difficult for a manufacturer or distributor to determine whether
or not a particular person who wishes to receive drug samples is a licensed practitioner. FDA has added the requirement
that the request form bear the practitioner's State license or DEA identification number to assist the manufacturer
or distributor in determining whether or not a person is a licensed practitioner. 
The statute requires a request form to bear the ``identity'' of the drug sample being requested. FDA has clarified
the meaning of ``identity'' in the proposed rule by specifying that the request form bear the proprietary or established
name and strength of the requested sample. 
PDMA requires that the request form bear the name of the manufacturer of the drug. However, where the statute also permits
an authorized distributor of record to distribute drug samples, the identity is incomplete without naming both the
manufacturer and distributor. In that circumstance, FDA proposes to require that the name of the distributor as well
as the manufacturer be made part of the sample request form. 
The statute also permits delivery of a drug sample to the pharmacy of a hospital or other health care entity at the request
of a licensed practitioner. However, the statute does not state how that request for delivery should be made. FDA has
tentatively concluded that the name and address of the intended recipient should be part of the request form. This
conclusion is reflected in the requirements in proposed 203.30 and 203.31 that, if the request is being
made by a licensed practitioner for delivery of a drug sample to a hospital or health care entity pharmacy, the name
and address of the intended recipient be included on the request form.


3. Drug Sample Receipts


Proposed 203.30 and 203.31 would require the execution of a written receipt by the recipient upon delivery
of a drug sample. The proposed sections also set out the contents of the receipt.
The statute requires the execution of a receipt upon delivery of a drug sample by mail or common carrier to establish
an audit trail for drug sample orders and deliveries and to ensure that drug samples ordered are received. The statute
does not require the execution of a written receipt for samples delivered by representatives in the apparent belief
that a representative always delivers a drug sample to a licensed practitioner at the same time that the licensed practitioner
signs the request form. 
A number of comments suggested that samples frequently are not delivered at the time of the request, i.e., some time
elapses between request and delivery, even when a representative personally delivers the drug sample. Sometimes
the period of time is only a few minutes, but often it may be hours, days, or weeks. In some instances, a representative
may receive a request for a drug sample at one sales call and deliver the requested sample at a later date. In these cases,
because of lapses of memory, mistake, or because a diversion scheme may be underway, the samples delivered may not
always match the request. Accordingly, the agency has tentatively concluded that the requirement for a written receipt
should extend to all drug sample deliveries, and that requirement is included in proposed 203.30 and
203.31.
A sample request and receipt need not be on separate forms if delivery is by a representative. A single form could be
devised and used containing all of the required information, which could be fully completed and executed with a single
signature, if the request and delivery are simultaneous, or executed in part with a signature for the request at the
time of the request, and executed in part with a second signature acknowledging receipt at the time of the delivery.
Proposed 203.30(c) and 203.31(c) state that a receipt is to be on a form designated by the manufacturer
or distributor. If the drug sample is received by the requesting practitioner, both proposed sections would require
that the receipt contain the name, address, professional title, and signature of the practitioner or the practitioner's
designee who acknowledges delivery of the drug sample; the proprietary or established name and strength of the drug
sample, the quantity, and the lot or control number of the drug sample delivered; and the date of the delivery. If the
drug sample is received by the pharmacy of a hospital or other health care entity at the request of a licensed practitioner,
both proposed sections would require the receipt to contain the name and address of the requesting licensed practitioner,
the name and address of the hospital or health care entity pharmacy designated to receive the drug sample; the name,
address, professional title, and signature of the person acknowledging delivery of the drug sample; the proprietary
or established name and strength of the drug sample, the quantity, and the lot or control number of the drug sample delivered;
and the date of the delivery. FDA believes this information is necessary to ensure that the sample received is the same
as the sample requested.




4. Additional Requirements For Delivery of Drug Samples by Representatives


PDMA provides that manufacturers and distributors that utilize representatives for the delivery of drug samples
must abide by a number of additional requirements. These additional requirements are intended to guard against the
kinds of abuses that Congress' findings stated had been an integral part of the drug sample delivery system and had
led to large-scale drug sample diversion.
a. 

Inventories of drug samples of manufacturers' and distributors' representatives

. The statute provides that each drug manufacturer or distributor that engages in drug sample distribution is required
to conduct, at least annually, a complete and accurate inventory of all drug samples in the possession of representatives
(21 U.S.C. 353(d)(3)(C)). The inventory is intended to guard against drug sample diversion by providing manufacturers
and distributors information that will permit them to identify diverters and take appropriate action and provide
data for FDA enforcement activities. 
The statute does not specify what is meant by such an inventory, nor how it is to be conducted and reported. It is FDA's
preliminary view that such an inventory must go beyond a mere physical count, and that meaningful information and
data can only be provided if the inventory is conducted utilizing generally accepted inventory practices and a reconciliation
report is prepared that relates the latest inventory to the most recent prior inventory and to drug samples acquired
and distributed in the interim.
Accordingly, proposed 203.31(d) would require the manufacturer or distributor to inventory all drug samples
in the possession of a manufacturer's or distributor's representative, and keep a record of the inventory. The record
would be required to identify all drug samples by established or proprietary name, dosage strength, and number of
sample units of each drug sample in stock. 
The proposal would require that the manufacturer or distributor reconcile the number of drug samples on hand with
the number received during the reporting period. The reconciliation report would be required to include: (1) A report
of the physical count of the most recently completed prior inventory; (2) a record of each drug sample shipment received
since the most recently completed prior inventory, including the sender and date of the shipment, and the established
or proprietary name, dosage strength, and number of sample units received; (3) a record of drug sample distributions
since the most recently completed inventory showing the name and address of each recipient of each sample unit shipped,
the date of the shipment, and the established or proprietary name, dosage strength, lot or control number, and number
of sample units shipped; and (4) an explanation for any significant loss.
To ensure impartiality, the proposal would also require that the inventory and reconciliation reports be conducted
and prepared by persons other than the representatives being inventoried or their supervisors or managers in their
direct line of supervision or command.
To guard against drug sample diversion, the proposed section would require manufacturers and distributors to evaluate
carefully any apparent discrepancy or significant loss in the inventory and reconciliation, and to investigate
fully any significant loss that cannot be justified.
b. 

Lists of manufacturers' and distributors' representatives

. PDMA requires that each manufacturer or authorized distributor of record who distributes drug samples maintain
a list of the names and addresses of its representatives who distribute drug samples and of the sites where drug samples
are stored. The proposal restates this statutory requirement (203.31(e)).
c. 

Notification if representative is convicted of violations

. The statute requires drug manufacturers or distributors of record to report to FDA any conviction of a representative
for violations of section 503(c)(1) of the act or a State law because of the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample
or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample. The proposal restates this statutory requirement (203.31(f)).


5. Drug Sample Storage and Handling Requirements


FDA has already excluded the distribution of drug samples by representatives from the definition of ``wholesale
distribution'' in 205.3(f)(7), and the agency is proposing to adopt this exclusion in the definition of ``wholesale
distribution'' in proposed 203.3(y). In view of this, representatives are not required to be licensed as wholesale
distributors by the States. PDMA requires manufacturers and authorized distributors of record to store all drug
samples under conditions that will maintain their stability, integrity, and effectiveness, and ensure that the
drug samples are not contaminated, deteriorated, or otherwise adulterated. Proposed 203.32 reflects this
requirement.
A representative, as an agent of the manufacturer or authorized distributor of record, is bound by the same standard,
and is required to take adequate precautions to ensure the safety and efficacy of any drug samples the representative
distributes. Generally, if a representative follows the labeling and compendial requirements for storage and handling
of a particular prescription drug in handling samples of that drug, the safety and efficacy of the drug sample may be
assured. 


6. Drug Sample Forms


A number of persons posed questions regarding drug sample request and receipt forms. FDA does not contemplate developing
its own forms for sample request and receipt, and instead intends to rely on manufacturers and distributors to develop
appropriate forms. Accordingly, any written request or receipt form developed by a manufacturer or authorized distributor
of record that complies with the requirements of proposed 203.33 would be acceptable to FDA if it contains the
information and any signature required in this section.
The agency wishes to encourage transmission and receipt of sample request and receipt forms by the most efficient
and expeditious means. Accordingly, proposed 203.33 would permit such forms to be delivered by mail, common
carrier, or private courier or to be transmitted photographically or electronically (i.e., by telephoto, wirephoto,
radiophoto, facsimile transmission (FAX), xerography, or electronic data transfer) or 
by any other system, provided that the method for transmission meets the security requirements set forth in proposed
203.60(d).


7. Written Policies and Procedures and Other Requirements for Drug Sample Distribution


FDA received a number of questions and comments from drug manufacturers and distributors seeking assistance in developing
appropriate administrative systems for distributing drug samples. There are a wide variety of administrative systems
in use, and enforcement has been complicated by the multiplicity of sample distribution procedures. Although standardization
is not necessary, the agency believes that clear internal administrative systems are essential to ensure that sample
distribution is carried out efficiently and that the statutory requirements are met.
In addition, FDA expects that manufacturers and distributors will have administrative systems in place to review
all losses and thefts so that patterns that may indicate the possibility of drug sample diversion will be detected.
The agency believes that this is consistent with Congress' intent that manufacturers and distributors develop adequate
audit and security systems to detect and investigate sample losses and thefts. (H. Rept. 10076, p. 20; S. Rept.
100202, p. 9.) 
Accordingly, under proposed 203.34, each manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that distributes
drug samples would be expected to adopt an administrative system to monitor losses and thefts.
Also, proposed 203.34 would require drug manufacturers and distributors to establish, maintain, and adhere
to written policies and procedures describing its administrative systems for sample distribution. The proposed
section contemplates that each manufacturer's or distributor's written policies and procedures would describe
its administrative system for: (1) Distributing drug samples by mail or common carrier, including methodology for
reconciliation of requests and receipts; (2) distributing drug samples by means other than mail or common carrier;
(3) conducting its inventory of drug samples under proposed 203.31(d), including an inventory schedule;
(4) auditing and detecting falsified or incomplete drug sample records; (5) identifying any significant loss of
drug samples and notifying FDA of the loss; (6) monitoring any loss or theft of drug samples; and (7) storing drug samples
by representatives.


8. Standing Requests


Both the House Report and Senate Report state that it is the intent of Congress that separate written requests be made
each time that samples are requested to be delivered and that standing requests do not fulfill the requirements of
the statute, except that the Senate Report states that FDA may provide by regulation for the delivery by mail of a small
number of samples for strictly limited periods of time. (H. Rept. 10076, p. 14; S. Rept. 100202, p. 6.)
Proposed 203.35 would require that separate written requests be made for each sample or group of samples and
does not allow for open-ended or standing requests to order drug samples.
The proposed section states, however, that the agency does not consider standing requests to include an arrangement
by which a licensed practitioner requests in writing that a specified number of drug samples be delivered over a period
of not more than 6 months, with the actual delivery dates for parts of the order to be set by subsequent communication.



9. Use of Fulfillment Houses, Shipping and Mailing Services, Other Contractors, and Comarketing Agreements


FDA understands that some manufacturers and distributors employ third parties to meet some of the requirements imposed
on them under PDMA. Third parties may include contractors such as fulfillment houses (companies that receive and
fill orders), mailing services, and other contractors. In addition, some manufacturers and distributors enter
into comarketing agreements in which one manufacturer or its representatives undertake a contractual commitment
to provide specified services relating to drug marketing for one or more other manufacturers or distributors. FDA
does not regard the use of third parties or entry into comarketing agreements as absolving a manufacturer or distributor
from its responsibility for complying with the statute and regulations pertaining to the distribution of its drug
samples.
Accordingly, proposed 203.36 would make clear that a manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that
uses a fulfillment house, shipping or mailing service, or other third party to fulfill some of the requirements of
PDMA, or engages in a comarketing agreement with another manufacturer, remains responsible for creating and maintaining
all requests, receipts, forms, reports, and records required under PDMA, PDA, and proposed part 203.
The agency will give a manufacturer or distributor that contracts with a third party to maintain some or all of its records
up to 48 hours to produce requested forms, reports, records, or other required documents. 


10. Investigation and Notification Requirements


In proposed 203.37, FDA proposes to codify the requirements and procedures for undertaking investigations
and making reports and notifications to the agency regarding sample distribution.
a. 

Drug sample diversion

. To ensure against drug sample diversion, proposed 203.37(a) would impose an investigation and reporting
requirement on a manufacturer or distributor who has reason to believe that any person has falsified drug sample requests,
receipts, or records. A full and complete investigation would have to be undertaken, and the manufacturer or distributor
would be required to report to FDA that such an investigation is under way and that it has completed such an investigation.
The proposal would require the report to include the reason for the investigation and the results of the investigation.
Because persons who falsify drug sample requests may be prosecuted under Title 18 of the United States Code, and because
falsifications are often associated with drug diversion, FDA is proposing to require manufacturers and distributors
to report such offenses to the agency.
Accordingly, the proposal would require that a manufacturer or distributor notify the agency of any falsification
of drug sample requests, receipts, or records, no later than 5 working days of learning of the falsification. The proposal
would permit an initial notification to be made by telephone or in writing, with a complete written report required
not later than 30 days after the date of the initial telephone or written notification.
b. 

Significant loss and known theft

. PDMA requires a manufacturer or distributor that distributes drug samples to notify FDA of any significant loss
of drug samples and any known theft of drug samples (21 U.S.C. 353(d)(3)(D)). FDA believes that enforcement would
be facilitated if the manufacturer or distributor promptly notifies the agency upon becoming aware of a significant
loss or theft. Accordingly, proposed 203.37(b) would require a manufacturer or distributor to notify FDA
within 5 working days of becoming aware of such a loss or theft.
FDA is proposing in 203.39 that charitable organizations be permitted to solicit and receive surplus drug
samples from licensed practitioners. As part of this program, FDA proposes to require that a charitable institution
that receives donated drug samples from a licensed practitioner also be required to notify FDA within 5 working days
of becoming aware of a loss or theft.
The reporting of any significant loss of drug samples is critical to the success of diversion control. Although a sample
can inadvertently become adulterated through mishandling, spoilage, or exposure to the elements, and although
samples are reported as stolen or lost from time to time, some representatives reportedly have used false claims of
damage, theft, or loss to divert drug samples into illicit commercial channels.
FDA intends this requirement to mean that the agency is to be advised of actual, physical losses, but not insignificant
accounting mistakes. The agency does not seek to receive reports concerning minor mathematical errors that are caught
and corrected in the normal course of business. These are not significant losses that would trigger the reporting
requirement. FDA seeks comment on how to distinguish between significant losses and minor accounting or inventory
errors.
The agency is mindful of the difficulty of establishing a threshold for significant loss and requests comment on this
issue and examples of situations that may and may not be appropriate reportable losses. FDA currently believes that
a small discrepancy in the total inventory of a multimillion dollar company may not be significant and thus may not
trigger the reporting requirement, but the loss of a hundred tablets of a particular drug by one sales representative
in one quarter might be significant. Similarly, a bookkeeping imbalance may not be a loss, as long as it represents
small inventory discrepancies that are likely to be accounted for in the normal course of audits or other methods of
inventory control.
FDA is not proposing to establish any ``tolerance'' level for sample losses below which no report is required. Each
manufacturer or distributor is required to establish its own threshold for determining when inventory not accounted
for is significant. This threshold should be derived from the firm's past experience in sample distribution and inventory
and should be based on the level of accuracy of its internal audit and security system.
Some manufacturers or distributors might be able to set a historically validated statistical baseline for the minimal
amounts of shrinkage that might be caused by routine accounting errors, mistakes, or losses, and a statistical baseline
for the frequency of occurrences that might routinely happen with a particular representative or product. However,
any loss of drug samples exceeding the number or frequencies of the established baselines must be reported. In addition,
any loss possibly associated with falsification of drug sample inventory or distribution records, or connected
with diversion activity, suspicious circumstances, or theft must be investigated and reported. 
When FDA becomes aware of a significant loss or theft of drug samples, it may conduct its own investigation in cooperation
with or independent of the manufacturer's or distributor's investigation.
FDA is proposing that an initial notification of a significant loss or known theft be made by telephone or in writing,
with a complete written report required not later than 30 days after the date of the initial notification.
c. 

Conviction of a representative

. PDMA requires a manufacturer or distributor to notify FDA of any conviction of its representatives for a violation
of section 503(c)(1) of the act or any State law involving the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample or the offer to
sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample (21 U.S.C. 353(d)(3)(E)).
FDA believes that enforcement would be facilitated if prompt notice of such a conviction is provided to the agency.
Accordingly, proposed 203.37(c)(1) would require a manufacturer or distributor to notify FDA within 5 working
days of becoming aware of the conviction of one or more of its representatives for such a violation.
To facilitate such reports, proposed 203.37(c) would permit an initial notification of such a conviction
to be made by telephone or in writing, but would require a complete written report to be submitted no later than 30 days
after the date of the initial notification.
d. 

Selection of individual responsible for drug sample information

. PDMA requires a manufacturer or distributor who distributes drug samples to provide FDA with the name and telephone
number of the individual responsible for responding to a request for information respecting drug samples (21 U.S.C.
353(d)(3)(F)).
FDA believes that enforcement would be facilitated if that information is transmitted to the agency shortly after
a designation is made. Accordingly, proposed 203.37(d) would require a manufacturer or distributor to notify
FDA in writing within 30 days of the selection of such an individual and would also require the manufacturer or distributor
to supply the individual's business address to expedite easy communication. 
e. 

Whom to notify at FDA

. The proposed rule would set forth the addresses to which notifications and reports are required to be made. Under
the proposal, reports and notifications are required to be made to the Division of Drug Quality Evaluation (HFD330),
Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, for human prescription drugs; or the Division of Inspections and Surveillance
(HFM650), Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research, for human biological prescription drug products.


11. Sample Lot or Control Numbers


A drug sample is a drug product as defined in 21 CFR 320.1(b). In 21 CFR 201.10(i)(1)(iii) and 201.18 of the general labeling
regulations and 21 CFR 211.130(b) of the current good manufacturing practice (CGMP) regulations, the label of drug
products is required to bear an identifying lot or control number capable of yielding the complete manufacturing
history of the package. Persons subject to the CGMP regulations are required under 21 CFR 211.196 to maintain distribution
records containing lot or control numbers. 
Maintenance of records of lot numbers on drug samples will help provide the kind of accountability and oversight of
prescription drug sample distribution that PDMA is intended to provide. A comment to the docket from the Department
of Health and Human Services' Office of the Inspector General not only endorsed this view, but suggested that maintenance
of drug sample distribution records, including lot numbers, would be important for enforcement purposes.
Accordingly, proposed 203.38 would require the manufacturer or authorized distributor of record of drug
samples to include in the drug sample labeling, the label of the sample unit, and distribution records identifying
lot or control numbers that will permit the tracking of the distribution of each drug sample unit from the point of its
manufacture to the representative or, if delivered by mail or common carrier, to the licensed practitioner. (In addition,
as discussed earlier, proposed 203.30 and 203.31 also require that drug sample request and receipt
forms include lot or control numbers.)


12. Sample Labels


FDA has been advised that some manufacturers and distributors use ordinary stock packages as drug samples. The agency
believes that this practice makes it difficult to distinguish samples from ordinary stock and contributes to drug
diversion. FDA believes that it is essential that drug samples be clearly and easily recognizable. 
Accordingly, proposed 203.38(c) would require that each sample unit bear a label that clearly denotes its
status as a drug sample. An appropriate designation would include (but not be limited to) the word ``sample'' and the
terms ``not for sale'' and ``professional courtesy package.'' The proposed section would also provide that drug
products that are labeled or imprinted as samples are deemed to be drug samples within the meaning of the act.
An article that meets the statutory definition of a drug sample that fails to bear the label required in proposed 203.38(c)
would still be a sample despite the absence of the required label.


13. Disposition of Drug Samples by Licensed Practitioners


PDMA permits manufacturers and distributors to distribute drug samples to licensed practitioners and to hospital
or health care entity pharmacies at the request of a licensed practitioner, provided certain documents and records
are created and maintained.
PDMA restricts drug sample distribution to ``licensed practitioners'' and to hospital or health care entity pharmacies
at the request of a ``licensed practitioner.'' A number of comments asked FDA to define the term ``licensed practitioner.''
For purposes of proposed part 203, FDA would, in proposed 
203.3(o), define the term ``licensed practitioner'' to mean any person licensed by State law to prescribe
drugs.
Physicians and surgeons, including osteopathic physicians and surgeons, are licensed to prescribe drugs in every
State, as are dentists and dental surgeons. In most States, podiatrists and optometrists are licensed to prescribe
certain drugs. In some States, pharmacists, physicians' assistants, paramedics, emergency medical technicians,
certified nurse practitioners, certified nurse midwives, or other medical professionals or paraprofessionals
may be licensed to prescribe drugs, sometimes on their own authority and sometimes on the authority of supervising
physicians. 
Some States limit the authority to prescribe prescription drugs to specific protocols or formularies for certain
professionals or paraprofessionals. For those professionals and paraprofessionals, FDA follows the requirements
of those States and considers the authority to request and receive drug samples to be similarly limited.
Section 503(d)(1) of the act provides that no person may distribute any drug sample unless the requirements set forth
in paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3) of that section are followed. Paragraphs (d)(2) and (d)(3) set forth detailed requirements
for manufacturers and authorized distributors of record to follow when they distribute drug samples by mail or common
carrier and by representatives. 
In the section-by-section analysis that the Senate and House of Representatives ordered to be published in the Congressional
Record when PDA was introduced and passed, Congress stated that it did not intend this prohibition to restrict the
provision of a drug sample to a patient by a licensed practitioner or by another person at the direction of a licensed
practitioner in certain circumstances. (Congressional Record, August 10, 1992, p. S 120612; August 12, 1992,
p. H 81078.) Consequently, in PDA, Congress amended section 503(d)(1) of the act to clarify the prohibition
by stating that providing or dispensing a drug sample in certain circumstances is not considered distribution within
the meaning of the statute. The clarification specifically excludes from the term ``distribute'' the provision
of a drug sample to a patient by: (1) A practitioner licensed to prescribe such drug, (2) a health care professional
acting at the direction and under the supervision of such a practitioner, and (3) the pharmacy of a hospital or of another
health care entity that received the drug sample in accordance with the act and regulations, and that is acting at the
direction of the health care practitioner who requested the drug sample. 
A licensed practitioner who provides a drug sample other than as set forth in section 503(d)(1) of the act is engaging
in an act of distribution, and drug sample distributions may be undertaken only as permitted by PDMA.
FDA advises that PDMA and this proposed rule would permit a licensed practitioner to: (1) Dispense the drug sample
as set forth in section 503(d)(1) of the act; (2) donate the drug sample to a charitable institution as provided for
in proposed 203.39; (3) return the drug sample to the manufacturer or distributor; or (4) destroy the drug sample.
FDA advises that any person, including a licensed practitioner, is prohibited from carrying out certain distributions
of drug samples, including: (1) Selling, purchasing, or trading (or offering to sell, purchase, or trade) any drug
sample; (2) requesting a manufacturer or distributor to deliver any drug sample to a retail pharmacy; (3) delivering
any drug sample to a retail pharmacy to be dispensed by the pharmacist to a patient of the licensed practitioner or other
persons; (4) giving any drug sample to a retail pharmacy; or (5) donating any drug sample to any charitable institution,
except as provided in proposed 203.39. 
PDA singles out dispensing of drug samples by health care professionals who act at the direction and under the supervision
of licensed practitioners, and hospital or health care entity pharmacies that receive drug samples in accordance
with the act and regulations and that act at the direction of the health care practitioners who request samples. Thus,
Congress clearly intended to distinguish these persons from retail pharmacists. The pharmacist in a retail pharmacy
is an autonomous professional who is licensed by the State and supervised by the State Board of Pharmacy and independently
dispenses drugs to patients in response to a prescription written by a separate licensed practitioner. 
A manufacturer or distributor is prohibited from delivering a drug sample to any retail pharmacy, and a retail pharmacy
is barred from receiving any drug sample from any person.
FDA has been advised that some licensed practitioners have requested that drug samples be delivered to retail pharmacies
in rural, isolated, or medically underserved areas for dispensing to the practitioner's patients. FDA views this
practice as being inconsistent with the accountability and oversight requirements imposed on sample distribution
by PDMA. The agency believes it makes enforcement of the sample distribution sections difficult, and is a potential
source of drug diversion. Accordingly, FDA advises that a practitioner should not request delivery of a drug sample
to a retail pharmacy and that a retail pharmacy should not accept a drug sample from a licensed practitioner or from
a manufacturer or distributor to be dispensed by the pharmacist to a practitioner's patients or to other persons.

To cut off a potential source of drug diversion and promote enforcement of PDMA, FDA advises licensed practitioners
that they should return adulterated or misbranded drug samples to the manufacturer or distributor, or destroy them.
Examples of drug samples that may be adulterated or misbranded include, but are not limited to: (1) Samples that have
gone beyond the labeled expiration date; (2) samples that are obviously discolored, soiled, spoiled, or otherwise
deteriorated; (3) samples with mutilated or damaged packaging; and (4) samples with labeling that is torn, adjusted,
or modified.


14. Donation of Drug Samples by Licensed Practitioners to Charitable Institutions


FDA is aware of the practice whereby some licensed practitioners give significant quantities of drug samples to charitable
institutions, such as free clinics, charity nursing homes, and charitable health care entities. Donated drug samples
are then dispensed by staff of the charitable institutions to patients or given to domestic or overseas missions or
other charitable institutions. 
Some charitable institutions actively solicit and collect donations of drug samples from licensed practitioners,
and it is not uncommon for charitable institutions to rely on donated drug samples as a significant source of prescription
drugs for patient care. In response to concerns about this practice, FDA established procedures for drug sample donations
in Compliance Policy Guide (CPG) 7132.08, ``Collection and Charitable Distribution of Drugs,'' issued on October
1, 1980. 
FDA continues to be concerned about drug sample donations. The agency believes that ongoing donations of drug samples
by licensed practitioners to charitable institutions could be considered as being inconsistent with the objectives
of accountability and oversight of sample distribution that PDMA is designed to provide. The agency is concerned
that this practice could make enforcement of the sample distribution sections difficult and provide an avenue for
drug diversion.
One of the principal purposes of PDMA was to prevent drug diversion. The easiest way to ensure that prescription drug
samples will not be diverted by charitable institutions would be to prohibit such institutions from possessing them.
However, Congress did not choose to do so. Indeed, PDMA explicitly allows prescription drug samples to be delivered
by a manufacturer or distributor to the pharmacy of a hospital or health care entity at the written request of a licensed
practitioner. Such a hospital or health care entity may be operated for profit or as a charitable institution. PDMA
is silent, however, as to whether or not there are other legitimate means by which a charitable institution can acquire
prescription drug samples.
The operations of not-for-profit hospitals, health care entities, and charitable institutions were closely scrutinized
by Congress before the passage of PDMA. Congress identified sales of drugs acquired at below-wholesale prices by
hospitals, health care entities, and charitable institutions as a source of unfair competition for prescription
drug wholesalers who are required to pay the average wholesale price, and suggested that such sales could be a source
of drug diversion. (See sec. 2(7), PDMA.)
Congress also identified the sale of prescription drug samples as a source of diversion (see sec. 2(6), PDMA), but
did not suggest that charitable institutions were peculiarly likely to engage in this abuse. Instead, Congress sought
to balance the need for restrictions that would prevent unfair competition and put an end to diversion of prescription
drug samples with the goals of providing prescription drugs to all who need them and permitting the distribution,
with appropriate restrictions, of prescription drug samples to patients. 
Congress did not alter this balance when in PDA, it revised the PDMA sample distribution restrictions.
FDA has preliminarily concluded that development of a system that would permit licensed practitioners to donate
excess quantities of prescription drug samples to charitable institutions for dispensing to patients or for further
distribution to domestic or overseas charitable institutions for dispensing to patients would be consistent with
PDMA, PDA, and the goal of providing adequate medical care to patients in need.
A system that would permit such donations with adequate restrictions would ensure wider opportunities for the provision
of medical care, including prescription drugs, to patients in need, and would, if appropriate controls were established
similar to those governing sample distribution, be consistent with the language and intent of the statute. Controls
would serve the objectives of accountability and oversight in the act and minimize the potential for drug diversion.
Such a system would also prevent the waste of significant quantities of valuable prescription drugs that have been
distributed as drug samples to licensed practitioners who have not used or dispensed them.
FDA believes that such a system should contain audit and security protection, similar to those required in the statute
for requesting drug samples from manufacturers or distributors and delivering them to licensed practitioners,
to provide accountability and oversight, and to protect the public against drug diversion. 
In designing such a system, the agency has kept in mind that the day-to-day operations of licensed practitioners,
including the provision of prescription drugs to patients, are regulated primarily by the States. In addition, there
is nothing in the legislative history of PDMA or PDA that would suggest that Congress intended FDA to become more deeply
involved in the regulation of the activities of licensed practitioners, except to the extent necessary to ensure
that drug samples are not diverted and that they do not, as a result, become adulterated or misbranded. 
Accordingly, the agency is proposing to establish a system of drug sample donation controls in proposed 203.39.
Proposed 203.39 would set up a system that would permit a licensed practitioner to donate a drug sample to a charitable
institution for dispensing to a patient of that institution or for distribution to another properly enrolled charitable
institution for subsequent dispensing to patients, provided that the institution is properly enrolled and certain
requirements are met.
Under proposed 203.39, a charitable institution that wishes to solicit or receive drug samples would be required
to: (1) Become properly enrolled by notifying the agency of its intention to solicit and receive drug sample donations
and obtaining a central file number; and (2) maintain records of drug samples received as donations and subsequently
dispensed or distributed to other charitable institutions. 
A recipient charitable institution must provide written certification of compliance with all regulations to a licensed
practitioner or charitable institution that provides a drug sample before receiving any drug sample donation.
Under the proposal, the charitable institution or organization (defined as one that has been granted tax exempt status
by the Department of the Treasury under the requirements of section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954)
would be required to enroll with FDA. A charitable institution would be enrolled when it has notified the appropriate
FDA district office that it intends to solicit and receive drug samples, has made application to the district office
for a central file number, and has received the number. A charitable institution would also be required to be licensed
by the State, if required by State law, and otherwise conform to State law.
Proposed 203.39(b) would establish procedures that the charitable institution would be required to follow
for receiving, holding, dispensing, and distributing donated drug samples. These requirements closely parallel
the statutory and proposed regulatory requirements for request and delivery of drug samples by manufacturers and
distributors to licensed practitioners.
Under proposed 203.39(b)(1), a recipient charitable institution would be required to provide a written identification
document to any employee or agent authorized to act on behalf of the institution in soliciting or receiving donations
of prescription drug samples. The employee or agent identification document would be valid for a limited term, but
could be renewed.
FDA is not proposing to delineate the form and content of the required identification document, but it should be sufficient
to readily identify the agent or employee of the charity and to establish that he or she has the authority to solicit
and receive drug sample donations. 
Such an identification document would be acceptable to the agency, for example, if it: (1) Would be effective for a
fixed term, e.g., 1 year, and would bear an expiration date; (2) would include the name, address, and central file number
of the charitable institution; (3) would exhibit the name, signature, and photograph of the authorized employee
or agent; and (4) would display an affirmative statement that the employee or agent identified on the document is authorized
by the institution to solicit and receive donations of prescription drug samples on behalf of the institution.
Proposed 203.39(b)(2) would require each recipient charitable institution to maintain a current listing
of all agents or employees authorized to solicit and receive drug samples on behalf of the institution. The listing
would also be required to include the name and telephone number of the authorized agent or employee in charge of prescription
drug sample solicitation, receipt, and redistribution.
One problem associated with drug sample diversion has been the practice of ``shucking'' drug samples (separating
drug sample dosage units from their sample packaging (usually blister packs, cards, or small boxes) and sample labeling)
and repackaging them (often in plastic bags or ``baggies,'' or in other nonstandard containers with other sample
dosage units from the same or different drug sample lots or production runs). This repackaging process may be accompanied
by physical tampering with the sample dosage units with sharp or abrasive instruments or with solvents to remove imprints
denoting their status as samples. Because this practice adulterates and misbrands the samples, proposed 203.39(b)(3)
would require that a drug sample could be donated by a licensed practitioner or donating charitable institution and
could be received by a charitable institution only in its original, unopened packaging with its labeling intact.
Proposed 203.39(b)(4) would permit delivery of a donated drug sample to a recipient charitable institution
by mail or common carrier, collection by an authorized agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution,
or personal delivery by a licensed practitioner or an authorized agent or employee of the donating charitable institution.
It would direct that the donor place the donated drug samples in a sealed carton for delivery to or collection by the
recipient institution.
Under proposed 203.39(b)(5), a donated drug sample could not be dispensed to a patient or be distributed to
another charitable institution until a licensed practitioner or registered pharmacist at the recipient charitable
institution has examined it to confirm that the drug sample delivered matches the donation record and that any adulterated
or misbranded drug sample is eliminated. The recipient would be required to reject any drug sample that: (1) Is out
of date; (2) has labeling that has become mutilated, obscured, or detached from the drug sample packaging; (3) shows
evidence of having been stored or shipped under conditions that might adversely affect its stability, integrity,
or effectiveness; (4) is for a drug product that has been recalled or is no longer marketed; or (5) is otherwise possibly
contaminated, deteriorated, or adulterated.
Proposed 203.39(b)(6) would require recipient charitable institutions to dispose of any drug sample found
to be unsuitable by destroying it or by returning it to the manufacturer and to maintain complete records of the disposition
of all drug samples destroyed or returned.
Proposed 203.39(b)(7) would require that, if a donated drug sample is collected by an authorized agent or employee
of the recipient charitable institution or is personally delivered by a licensed practitioner or an authorized agent
of a donating charitable institution, the employee or agent of the recipient institution is to prepare at the time
of collection or delivery a complete and accurate donation record for the samples. Both the donor and recipient would
be required to sign the donation record when it is created, and the donor and recipient would each retain a copy. 
If a donated drug sample is transferred by mail or common carrier, the licensed practitioner or donating charitable
institution would be required to prepare a donation record that would be signed by the licensed practitioner or authorized
agent of the donating charitable institution (203.39(b)(8) and (b)(9)). The donation record would be shipped
with the drug sample. An authorized agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution would be required to
countersign it, keep a copy, and return a copy to the licensed practitioner or donating charitable institution. 
Proposed 203.39(b)(9) would require the donation record to include: (1) The name, address, and telephone
number of the licensed practitioner (or donating charitable institution), and the practitioner's professional
title and State license number or DEA identification number; (2) the manufacturer, brand name, quantity, and lot
or control number of the sample; (3) the date of the donation; (4) the signature of the licensed practitioner (or the
signature of the authorized agent of the donating charitable institution); and (5) the signature of the authorized
agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution.
The proposal would require charitable institutions to maintain complete and accurate records of donation, receipt,
inspection, inventory, dispensing, redistribution, destruction, and returns sufficient for complete accountability
and auditing of drug sample stocks (203.39(b)(10)).
It would also require each recipient charitable institution to conduct an inventory of drug sample stocks, at least
annually, utilizing independent inventory personnel, and to prepare a report reconciling the results of each inventory
with the most immediate prior inventory. Inventory discrepancies and reconciliation problems would be required
to be investigated by the charitable institution and reported to FDA (203.39(b)(11)).
Proposed 203.39(b)(12) would require that a recipient charitable institution provide written certification
to the licensed practitioner or donating charitable institution that it is in conformity with all the requirements
of proposed part 203 before receiving any drug sample donation. Such certification, which links the licensed practitioner
with the charitable institution, could be made part of the donation record.
Proposed 203.39(b)(13) would require a recipient charitable institution to store drug samples under conditions
that will maintain the samples' stability, integrity, and effectiveness, and ensure that the drug samples will be
free of contamination, deterioration, and adulteration.
Proposed 203.39(c) would also specify that a charitable institution may donate drug samples to another recipient
charitable institution for dispensing to patients, provided that the recipient charitable institution meets the
appropriate requirements.
In addition to the procedure for drug sample donations delineated in proposed 203.39, there are alternative
means available for charities to receive donated prescription drug products from manufacturers and distributors.
These include: (1) Direct donations of prescription drug stock by manufacturers or distributors, with records of
distribution and receipt being maintained in accordance with State regulations; and (2) deliveries of drug samples
to charity hospital and health care entity pharmacies by manufacturers and distributors or their representatives
under the request of a licensed practitioner in accordance with the requirements set forth in proposed 203.30
and 203.31. 


15. Free Distributions That Are Not Samples


There are certain situations in which manufacturers and distributors may deliver prescription drugs at no charge
without such free distributions being samples. Accordingly, such distributions are not subject to the recordkeeping
requirements for samples. Nevertheless, FDA believes that States and manufacturers and distributors should establish
recordkeeping requirements and systems, where appropriate, to prevent diversion.
a. 

Distribution of drugs to indigent patients

. As noted above, a drug sample is defined at proposed 203.3(i) as a unit of a prescription drug that: (1) Is not
intended to be sold; and (2) is intended to promote the sale of the drug. Drugs that are given free of charge to patients
in some circumstances may not necessarily be samples. For example, manufacturers of some expensive new drugs have
decided that, under certain circumstances, they will arrange for licensed practitioners to prescribe and dispense
these drugs at no charge or at reduced cost to indigent patients. In FDA's view, if the objective of this practice is
to ensure that patients in need of prescription drugs will have access to them, whatever their financial circumstances,
then it is not a promotional scheme, and such drugs are not samples under section 503(c)(1) of the act or proposed 203.3(i).
b. 

Starter packs

. Starter packs are also not drug samples. Starter packs are prescription drug products distributed without charge
by manufacturers or distributors to pharmacists with the intent that the pharmacists place the prescription drugs
in stock and sell them at retail. Starter packs may be distributed by manufacturers' or wholesale distributors' representatives
(detailers), by mail or common carrier, or by direct delivery from a manufacturer or distributor. Starter packs of
solid oral dosage forms can be offered in ordinary stock packages, in special packaging comprised of unit-of-use
or course-of-treatment sizes, or in special packaging smaller than standard stock packages whose sizes have no relationship
to treatment regimens. 
Starter packs are intended to ``prime the pump'' by making a product available at no cost to the pharmacist so the pharmacist
will fill prescriptions with the manufacturer's product. They permit the patient and pharmacist to become familiar
with the manufacturer's product. Starter packs are a widely used selling tool and thus are intended to promote the
sale of the drug. Representatives often will make a sales presentation before delivering them or at the same time they
are delivered.
PDMA's definition of drug sample sets up a two-element test that determines whether a particular item of prescription
drug is a drug sample. The two-element test requires that the drug: (1) Is not intended to be sold; and (2) is intended
to promote the sale of the drug. Starter packs meet the second element of the drug sample test because they are intended
to promote the sale of a particular drug. However, even though starter packs are delivered without charge to pharmacists,
they do not conform to the first element of the statutory drug sample definition because the manufacturer or distributor
intends that they be sold by the pharmacist. Accordingly, starter packs are not samples.
Because starter packs are not samples, they are not subject to the sample restrictions in PDMA. Instead, they are subject
to regulation as prescription drugs under the act in like manner as stock shipments of prescription drugs. Because
starter packs are not drug samples, the request, receipt, and recordkeeping requirements in PDMA for samples do not
apply, and pharmacists are free to sell these products at retail.
Because starter packs provide opportunities for diversion similar to those presented by drug samples, manufacturers,
and distributors should establish and maintain accounting, audit, and security systems for starter packs to guard
against diversion.
c. 

Pharmacy colleges

. For many years, manufacturers have given pharmacy schools and colleges pharmaceutical products for teaching purposes.
These products are given to help the schools train pharmacy students in drug formulation, compounding, packaging,
and labeling, and to familiarize students with dosage forms. These products are not intended to be distributed or
dispensed, nor are they intended to promote the sale of the drug. Accordingly, the agency does not view prescription
drugs donated to colleges of pharmacy for educational purposes as drug samples.
d. 

Donations of drugs to charitable institutions

. There is nothing in PDMA or in the legislative history of PDMA that would suggest that PDMA is intended to discourage
direct donations by manufacturers or distributors of stock packages of prescription drug products to charitable
institutions. Because these donations provide patients with the prescription drugs they need without regard to
cost and are not intended to promote the sale of the drug, the distributions are not sample distributions within the
meaning of section 503(c)(1) of the act or proposed 203.3(i).


16. ``Bid'' and ``Commercial'' Samples 


Manufacturers of drug products sometimes take delivery of bulk drug ingredients or precursor specimens for testing
and evaluation purposes. These specimens are scrutinized for compatibility with a manufacturer's production equipment
and to determine if they are suitable for use in formulating the drug products the manufacturer wishes to produce.
Sometimes, manufacturers take delivery of examples of unpackaged finished dosage forms to determine if they are
suitable for use with the manufacturer's packaging materials and equipment. These specimens, referred to as ``bid''
or ``commercial'' samples, are generally delivered in limited quantities for evaluation purposes. 
The act defines a drug sample as a unit of a drug subject to section 503(b) of the act (i.e., a prescription drug), which
is not intended to be sold and is intended to promote the sale of the drug (21 U.S.C. 353(c)(1)). Proposed 203.3(i)
restates this definition. Because of the statutory language and the threat of diversion, persons who distribute
``bid'' or ``commercial'' samples should follow the requirements for sample distribution set forth in the act and
this proposed rule.


17. Retail Pharmacists and Drug Samples


Proposed 203.40 would provide that the presence in a retail pharmacy of any drug sample shall be considered
evidence that the drug sample was obtained by the retail pharmacy in violation of section 503(c)(1) of the act.


E. Wholesale Distribution


1. Identifying Statements (``Pedigrees'') 


Section 503(e)(1) of the act imposed a new requirement on ``unauthorized'' or ``secondary'' wholesale prescription
drug distributors (wholesale drug distributors who are not authorized distributors of record) to provide to a wholesale
distributor purchaser, before the completion of a sale, a statement identifying each sale of the drug (often referred
to as a ``statement of origin'' or ``drug pedigree''). PDA expanded this requirement by specifying the information
to be included in the drug pedigree and mandating that it be provided to retail pharmacy buyers as well as wholesale
distributor purchasers. 
The pedigree requirements for unauthorized distributors under PDMA, as later amended by PDA, have been a matter of
continuing interest and discussion. These requirements affect only unauthorized wholesale distributors (i.e.,
those who do not have an ongoing business relationship with a manufacturer to distribute that manufacturer's drugs)
and impose upon them more stringent requirements than are imposed on authorized distributors of record. 
Before passage of PDA, section 503(e)(1) of the act required that each person engaged in the wholesale distribution
of drugs subject to section 503(b) of the act (prescription drugs) who is not an authorized distributor of record of
such drugs provide to each wholesale distributor of such drugs a statement identifying each sale of the drug, including
the date of the sale, before the sale to such wholesale distributor. Soon after the enactment of PDMA, the terms ``secondary''
and ``unauthorized'' distributors became common to describe persons who are not authorized distributors of record,
and the term ``drug pedigree'' became popular to describe the required statement of origin.
In order to make it possible to distinguish between authorized and unauthorized distributors, section 503(e)(1)
of the act also required each manufacturer to maintain at its corporate offices a current list of its authorized distributors.
This requirement was not altered by PDA, which otherwise amplified the pedigree requirement.
When Congress adopted section 503(e)(1) of the act, it was responding to information uncovered by the Oversight Subcommittee
of the House Committee on Energy and Commerce. The Committee found that most counterfeit, stolen, expired, or fraudulently
obtained drugs entering commercial channels had been handled by distributors who were not authorized to distribute
the manufacturer's product, rather than by the manufacturer's authorized distributors. Accordingly, Congress
imposed a more stringent reporting requirement on distributions by unauthorized distributors, requiring them
to inform their wholesale customers of all previous sales of the drug product. (H. Rept. 10076, p. 17.)
A number of comments to the agency after enactment of PDMA reflected concerns about application of the drug pedigree
requirement. One comment asked FDA to consider whether the drug pedigree must include the name and address of the seller,
or whether a general statement, such as ``this shipment of drugs came from an unnamed authorized distributor on _________
__, 199_,'' or a coded statement, such as ``this shipment of drugs came from unauthorized distributor [code] on _______
__, 199_,'' would comply with PDMA.
The agency stated its position on the form and content of the drug pedigree requirement in PDMA in a section of the August
1, 1988, information and guidance letter to regulated industry and other interested parties. The August 1, 1988,
letter requested that any drug pedigree be in writing, that it bear the title ``Statement Identifying Prior Sales
of Prescription Drugs by Unauthorized Distributors Required by the Prescription Drug Marketing Act,'' and that
it include all necessary identifying information regarding all sales in the chain of distribution of the product,
starting with the manufacturer or authorized distributor of record. The agency believed that this was consistent
with the legislative history of PDMA, which indicated that Congress intended that the drug pedigree be a written certification
fully identifying the source and place from which the drugs were obtained. (H. Rept. 10076, p. 17; S. Rept. 100202,
p. 7.) 
In the August 1, 1988, letter, the agency requested that the identifying statement include the following information:
(1) The business name and address of the source from which the drug was purchased; (2) the date of the sale; and (3) the
identity, strength, container size, number of containers, and lot number(s) of the drug. FDA also requested that
the drug pedigree accompany all products purchased from an unauthorized distributor, even when they are resold.

Late in 1988, the American Association of Pharmaceutical Distributors (AAPD), an organization of wholesale prescription
drug distributors who are not authorized distributors of record for some or all of the products they distribute, designed
a form for drug pedigrees that substituted codes for names and addresses. AAPD's system, which is now reportedly being
used by its members and certain nonmembers, is administered by an accountant employed by AAPD for that purpose. The
agency does not know if other code systems exist that are being used in place of the required names and addresses on drug
pedigrees.
In the months following passage of PDMA, some Senators and members of Congress wrote to support coded pedigrees or
pedigrees that did not disclose full names and addresses. However, others expressed their support for full disclosure
on drug pedigrees. 
Even before passage of PDA, FDA considered that Congress had intended the PDMA drug pedigree requirement to require
that each party in a chain of distribution be given sufficient information to make an informed determination as to
the origin of drugs being purchased. In the agency's view, general statements of origin could not provide sufficient
information for purchasers, and coded statements that made information unintelligible to purchasers without the
intervention of a trade association or regulatory agency to decipher the code, would not provide purchasers with
the information that Congress intended that they receive. In FDA's opinion, the only meaningful way to identify the
``source and place'' from which drugs were obtained was to require that the identifying statement bear the business
name and address of each previous distributor and the date of each prior sale. Furthermore, the only meaningful way
to identify fully the drugs being described was to provide detailed particulars about the drugs being sold. FDA has
stated this position in a number of letters, speeches, and public comments since PDMA became law. 
The PDA amendments to the PDMA significantly tightened the drug pedigree requirement and constitute Congress' latest
word on the issue. PDA amended section 503(e)(1) of the act to require that unauthorized distributors provide, before
a sale takes place, a drug pedigree to every wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy customer. The drug pedigree
is required to identify all prior sales, purchases, or trades of such drugs and to specify by name and address all parties
to the transactions. PDA also states that FDA may require additional information or a specific form for the drug pedigree.
As Congress stated in the section-by-section analysis that accompanied PDA when it was introduced and passed, the
stricter language in the PDA revision ``makes it clear'' that any wholesale distribution of a prescription drug by
an unauthorized distributor, including any sale to another unauthorized distributor, an authorized distributor
of record, or a retail pharmacy, must be preceded by a full and complete identifying statement. ``The identifying
statement,'' the analysis added, ``must in all cases include the dates of each transaction involving the drug and
the names and addresses of all parties to the transaction, and must contain any such other information as the Secretary
may require.'' (Congressional Record, page S 12061, August 10, 1992; page H 8107, August 12, 1992.)
Passage of PDA thus gave added emphasis to Congress' intent, as stated in the legislative history of PDMA, to restore
accountability to the wholesale sector of the pharmaceutical market and to regulate the wholesale distribution
of prescription drug products. (H. Rept. 10076, pp. 1617; S. Rept. 100202, p. 7.) 
Proposed 203.50(a) would restate the statutory requirement that, before the completion of any wholesale
distribution by an unauthorized wholesaler to another wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy, the seller is required
to provide to the purchaser a statement identifying each prior sale, purchase, or trade of such drug. It would require
that the drug pedigree include: (1) The proprietary and established name of the drug; (2) the dosage; (3) the container
size; (4) the number of containers; (5) the drug's lot or control number(s); (6) the business name and address of all
parties to each prior transaction involving the drug, starting with the manufacturer; and (7) the date of each previous
transaction involving the drug.


2. Additional Manufacturing Processes


A manufacturer applies at least one manufacturing process to a bulk drug substance or precursor product to produce
a finished dosage form or a precursor product that will be further manufactured into a finished dosage form. Each of
these processes produces a changed product. Accordingly, proposed 203.50(b) specifies that a manufacturer
who subjects a drug to any additional manufacturing processes to produce a different drug is not required to provide
to a purchaser a statement identifying the previous sales of the component drug or drugs.


3. Authorized Distributor Lists


Proposed 203.50(c) would require each manufacturer to maintain at the corporate offices a current written
list of all authorized distributors of record. The term ``authorized distributor of record'' is defined in proposed
203.3(b) to mean a distributor with whom a manufacturer has established an ongoing relationship to distribute
such manufacturer's products. Because an agreement by which a single shipment of drugs is distributed would not constitute
an ongoing relationship (see proposed 203.3(r)) that shipment would not establish an ``authorized distributor
of record'' relationship.
The proposal would also require the manufacturer's list to specify whether each distributor listed is authorized
to distribute the manufacturer's full product line, or only particular, specified products. The proposal would
also require the manufacturer to update the list on a continuing basis. 
In the PDMA legislative history, Congress stated that manufacturers' lists of authorized distributors of record
should be freely available to the public. Accordingly, FDA is also proposing that each manufacturer make its list
of authorized distributors of record available on request to the public for inspection and copying. 


4. Unknown Origins or ``Salvaged'' Drugs


A number of comments inquired about persons that purchase lost or abandoned drugs from transportation companies
for sale to licensed wholesale distributors. This procedure is sometimes referred to as drug salvage, although it
differs from the process identified as salvaging in 21 CFR part 211. These inquiries suggested that identifying statements
for ``salvaged'' drugs should list the transportation company from which the drugs were ``salvaged'' as the point
of origin. 
FDA believes that this kind of business operation cannot meet the requirements of the CGMP regulations, nor can it
operate in a manner consistent with PDMA's requirements (e.g., that a wholesale distributor give a wholesale distributor
purchaser a statement of origin for the product being sold).
FDA's view is that the requirement for a statement of origin is designed to permit prospective purchasers to determine
if the source of a drug is a legitimate source, such as an authorized distributor or secondary distributor licensed
by the State as a wholesale distributor. The agency believes that an ``origin unknown'' statement or a statement that
a particular shipment of prescription drugs originated as ``salvage'' or that they came from a lost shipment from
unknown persons at an unknown time would not be consistent with the meaning of that provision. Thus, in FDA's view,
use of an ``origin unknown'' or ``salvage'' statement would not meet the requirement for an identifying statement
under section 503(e)(1) of the act. 


5. State Licensing of Wholesale Distributors


PDMA established a requirement that any person engaged in the wholesale distribution in interstate commerce of prescription
drugs in a State be licensed by the State in accordance with guidelines issued as a final rule by the agency (21 U.S.C.
353(e)(2)). The final rule that set forth guidelines for State licensing of wholesale prescription drug distributors
was published in the 

Federal Register

 of September 14, 1990 (55 FR 38012), making the requirement that any person engaging in the wholesale distribution
of prescription drugs in interstate commerce shall be licensed by the State in which it operates, become effective
September 15, 1992.
However, Congress passed PDA, which modified the State licensing requirement, before the date on which the requirement
would have gone into effect. PDA amended section 503(e) of the act to establish a temporary Federal registration procedure
for wholesale prescription drug distributors in those States that do not have a licensing program that meets the Federal
guidelines. 
This temporary Federal wholesale distributor registration procedure expires on September 14, 1994. After that
date, all persons engaged in the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs in interstate commerce are required
to be licensed by the State.
FDA issued a letter to industry and other interested persons on September 3, 1992, that provides information and guidance
on the procedure to be followed by wholesale distributors required to register under the temporary Federal wholesale
distributor registration procedure established by PDA. (See the 

Federal Register

 of December 2, 1992 (57 FR 57068).) 


6. Defining ``Wholesale Distribution''


The term ``wholesale distribution'' is defined in section 503(e)(4)(B) of the act as distribution of prescription
drugs to other than the consumer or patient, but not including intracompany sales or distributions of drugs described
in section 503(c)(3)(B) of the act. The exclusions under section 503(c)(3)(B) of the act are for the purchase or other
acquisition by a hospital or other health care entity member of a group purchasing organization of a drug for its own
use from the organization or from other hospitals or health care entity members of the organization; the sale, purchase,
or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug by a charitable organization to a nonprofit affiliate
of the organization to the extent otherwise permitted by law; the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell,
purchase, or trade a drug among hospitals or other health care entities under common control; the sale, purchase,
or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug for emergency medical reasons; and the sale, purchase,
or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug pursuant to a prescription
executed in accordance with section 503(b) of the act.
These exclusions are part of the proposed definition of ``wholesale distribution'' in proposed 203.3(y).

For clarity, FDA proposes to codify additional exclusions in proposed 203.3(y) that have already been discussed
in this notice. They are the distribution of drug samples by manufacturers' and authorized distributors' representatives;
the sale, purchase, or trade of blood and blood components intended for transfusion; drug reshipments, when conducted
in accordance with proposed 203.23; and drug returns, when conducted in accordance with proposed 203.24.

In addition, as discussed below, FDA is proposing to codify an exclusion from the definition of wholesale distribution
for the sale of minimal quantities of drugs by retail pharmacies to licensed practitioners for office use. 
For consistency, FDA is also proposing to incorporate these additional exclusions in the definition of ``wholesale
distribution'' at 205.3(f). 


7. Sales to Licensed Practitioners by Retail Pharmacies


In general, a retail pharmacy that engages in the business of selling prescription drugs to licensed practitioners
is a wholesale distributor that, since September 15, 1992, has been required to be licensed by the State as a wholesaler
or registered with FDA if the State does not have a conforming licensing program.
Licensed practitioners often purchase small quantities of drugs from retail pharmacies for office use. Many wholesale
distributors are reluctant to open accounts with individual practitioners for small quantities of drugs, and some
practitioners believe that there is no cost-effective, reasonable alternative for making occasional purchases
of small quantities of drugs for office use.
The legislative history supports the view that Congress did not intend to interfere with this small-scale practice.
According to the House Report, ``It is the express intent of the Committee that the scope of section 6 include distribution
by * * * all sellers of prescription drugs in wholesale quantities to persons or firms other than the consumer or patient.''

(H. Rept. 10076, p. 17.)
FDA believes that permitting the sale of small quantities of prescription drugs by retail pharmacies to licensed
practitioners for office use without the requirement of a State wholesale distributor's license satisfies a legitimate
need and is consistent with the intent of the statute. Accordingly, the agency has included language in proposed 203.3(y)
that would exclude the sale of minimal quantities of drugs by retail pharmacies to licensed practitioners for office
use from the definition of ``wholesale distribution.''
In this context, sales of prescription drugs by a retail pharmacy to licensed practitioners for office use will be
considered to be minimal if the total annual dollar volume of prescription drugs sold to licensed practitioners does
not exceed 5 percent of the dollar volume of that retail pharmacy's annual prescription drug sales.
If a retail pharmacy is engaged in wholesale sales of prescription drugs in any amount after September 15, 1992, the
presumption will be that the retail pharmacy is, in fact, a wholesale distributor that must be licensed by the State
in accordance with part 205, or registered with FDA if the State does not have a conforming licensing program, unless
it can be shown that the total annual dollar volume of its sales to licensed practitioners does not exceed 5 percent
of the dollar volume of that pharmacy's annual prescription drug sales and the pharmacy does not otherwise engage
in wholesale distribution.


8. Sales to Wholesale Distributors by Retail Pharmacies


FDA received a number of questions asking whether PDMA prohibits a retail pharmacy from selling prescription drugs
to a wholesale distributor. FDA advises that there is no provision in PDMA, the final PDMA State licensing guidelines,
or this proposed rule that would prohibit a retail pharmacy from selling prescription drugs to a wholesale distributor.
However, a retail pharmacy that engages in such sales would become a wholesale distributor that would be required
to provide the wholesale distributor purchaser with an identifying statement for the drugs sold and would be required
to have a valid State wholesale distributor license or be registered with FDA if the State does not have a conforming
licensing program. 


F. Request and Receipt Forms, Reports, and Records


Proposed 203.60 sets forth standards for request and receipt forms, reports, and for the creation, retention,
and maintenance of records and other documents under proposed part 203. These requirements, although procedural
in nature, are essential for the efficient administration and enforcement of PDMA and proposed part 203.


1. Recordkeeping Media


FDA is proposing that manufacturers and distributors have the option of creating or maintaining records on nonpaper
media. FDA believes that recent technological advances compel the agency to reexamine how the requirements for written
records (including forms bearing written signatures) can be satisfied by electronic media. FDA believes that greater
efficiency, lower costs, and more effective enforcement can result from an effort to facilitate the development
and use of photographic, electronic, and other nonpaper devices, and media for creation and maintenance of sample
requests, receipts, records, and other forms. 
Accordingly, proposed 203.60(a) would permit request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents
required by PDMA, PDA, and this proposed rule to be created on paper or on electronic media.
Proposed 203.60(b) would permit request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents required
by PDMA, PDA, and this proposal that are created on paper to be maintained on paper or by photographic or electronic
recordation or imaging, provided that appropriate security and authentication requirements are followed.
Proposed 203.60(c) would permit request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents required
by PDMA, PDA, and this proposal that are created by means of electronic data entry and recordkeeping equipment to be
stored using computer technologies, provided that appropriate security and authentication requirements are followed.
Under this proposal, appropriate photographic records and electrographic records could include, but not be limited
to, those maintained on microfilm, microcard, microfiche, and xerographic copies. Appropriate electronic records
could include, but not be limited to, those maintained in analog or digital form or by means of image recording technology
on computer disks, cards, tapes, memory chips, or optical media. 


2. Security and Authentication Requirements for Request and Receipt Forms, Reports, Records, and Other Documents


The proposed rule would require that any request or receipt form, report, record, or other document, and any signature
appearing thereon, is to be created, maintained, or transmitted in a form that provides reasonable assurance of being:
(1) Resistant to tampering, revision, modification, or alteration; (2) preserved in accessible and retrievable
fashion; and (3) visible or readily made visible to permit copying or other means of duplication for purposes of review,
analysis, verification, authentication, and reproduction by the person who executed the form or created the record,
by the manufacturer or distributor, and by authorized personnel of FDA or other regulatory and law enforcement agencies.


3. Retention of Request and Receipt Forms, Reports, Lists, Records, and Other Documents


The proposed rule also sets standards for the retention of request and receipt forms, reports, lists, records, and
other documents. PDMA requires the retention of certain records for not less than 3 years. FDA believes that, with
one exception, the 3-year minimum requirement should be extended to all records created and maintained under the
statute and the proposed rule to ensure efficient enforcement and compliance operations. Accordingly, the proposal
would state that any person required to create or maintain forms, reports, lists, or other records under the statute
or regulations would have to retain them for at least 3 years after the date of their creation.
The agency believes that a more stringent standard is necessary for the retention of records relating to drug sample
distribution because some drug samples are relatively stable and may remain unexpired even though 3 or more years
may have elapsed since they were packaged and shipped. Accordingly, the proposal would require that forms, reports,
or records relating to the distribution of drug samples be retained for at least 3 years after the date of the record's
creation or the date of expiration of a drug sample for which the record is being kept, whichever is later.


4. Availability of Forms, Reports, Lists, and Records


Forms, reports, lists, or other records are of little value to FDA or other regulatory and law enforcement agencies,
unless they are readily available for inspection and copying. Accordingly, the proposal would compel any person
required to create or maintain forms, reports, lists, or other records under PDMA, PDA, or the proposed rule to make
them available upon request, in a form that permits copying or other means of duplication, to FDA or other Federal,
State, or local regulatory and law enforcement officials for review and reproduction. 


5. Signatures on Forms, Reports, or Records


By affixing a signature to a document, the person who signs it is giving his or her personal verification of the validity
of a document. For example, by affixing a signature to a drug sample request form, the person signing it attests to the
fact that he or she is a licensed practitioner and that he or she has requested delivery of a specific amount and type
of drug sample. Similarly, a signature on a receipt verifies the delivery of the drug samples to the licensed practitioner
or to the pharmacy of a hospital or other health care entity. 
FDA has preliminarily concluded that a valid signature need not be made by pen or indelible pencil on a piece of paper.
Instead, the agency believes that in certain circumstances a valid signature can be created and recorded by electronic
means.
Accordingly, under proposed 203.61 a verifiable signature may be made by use of a writing or marking instrument
such as a pen, indelible pencil, or electronic stylus on electronic pad. Because some imprinting or copying devices
can be used to forge or falsely imprint a signature, and because false signatures and forgeries could be an integral
part of a drug diversion scheme, the proposal would prohibit imprinting or automatic reproduction of a signature
by a device or machine such as a stamp, copier, or autopen. 
Proposed 203.61 would establish performance standards and special security requirements for signatures
signed on electronic media. Proposed 203.61(b) would require that if electronic media are used to execute
and record signatures, it must be installed and operated with: (1) A system permitting visual review of the signature;
(2) a system to detect or inhibit entry of a forged, traced, fraudulent, or counterfeit signature, i.e., authentication
software; and (3) a mechanism that blocks alteration of documents or signatures after the signatures are made, i.e.,
a locking device.
Persons interested in commenting on electronic records and electronic signatures should be aware that an agency
task force, the FDA Electronic Identification/Signature Working Group, is currently assessing issues relating
to electronic signatures and recordkeeping. In the 

Federal Register

 of July 21, 1992 (57 FR 32185), FDA published an advance notice of proposed rulemaking (ANPRM) entitled ``Electronic
Identification/Signatures; Electronic Records; Request for Information and Comments.'' The notice stated that
the agency is considering whether it should propose regulations that would, under certain circumstances, accept
electronic signatures in place of handwritten signatures where signatures are currently required in Title 21 of
the Code of Federal Regulations and is asking for comments on any related issues. Comments were to be identified with
Docket No. 92N0251. The working group has reviewed the comments in the docket and the agency is considering
additional action. The agency's emerging position on electronic signatures and records will be coordinated with
the final PDMA policies requirements and administrative procedures rule. Suggestions on electronic signatures
and other signature substitutes and surrogates made to FDA in response to this proposed rule will also be made available
to the working group force for its review. 


G. Penalties and Rewards


1. Criminal Penalties


Most violations of the act are punishable as misdemeanors, except that a violation committed after a prior conviction,
or a violation committed with the intent to defraud or mislead, is punishable as a felony. In addition, FDA advises
that persons who knowingly make any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statements or representations, or knowingly
make or use any false writing or document, in any matter within the jurisdiction of a Federal department or agency;
who engage in mail fraud or wire fraud; or who otherwise obstruct agency regulatory activities may be subject to prosecution
under Title 18 of the United States Code.
Most PDMA violations are felonies punishable by a prison term of not more than 10 years, a fine of not more than $250,000,
or both. Felonies under PDMA include the knowing importation of a drug in violation of section 801(d)(1) of the act;
the knowing sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or drug sample, or the knowing offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug
or drug sample in violation of section 503(c)(1) of the act; the knowing sale, purchase, or trade of a drug coupon; the
knowing offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug coupon, or the knowing counterfeiting of such a coupon in violation
of section 503(c)(2) of the act; or the knowing distribution of drugs in violation of section 503(e)(2)(A) of the act.
Misdemeanors include the distribution of a drug sample in violation of section 503(d) of the act and the failure to
comply with the ``pedigree'' requirement of section 503(e)(1)(A) of the act.


2. Civil Penalties


PDMA also includes provisions for civil penalties for certain violations of the drug sample distribution requirements.
A manufacturer or distributor who distributes drug samples by means other than mail or common carrier, whose representative,
in the course of his or her employment, violates the PDMA prohibition against the sale, purchase, or trade or offer
to sell, purchase, or trade drug samples, or any State law prohibiting the sale, purchase, or trade or offer to sell,
purchase, or trade drug samples, is, upon conviction of the representative, subject to civil penalties as follows:
(1) A civil penalty of not more than $50,000 for each of the first two such violations resulting in a conviction of any
representative of the manufacturer or distributor in any 10-year period; and (2) a civil penalty of not more than $1,000,000
for each violation resulting in a conviction of any representative after the second conviction in any 10-year period.
A manufacturer or distributor who fails to report to FDA any conviction of one of its representatives for violations
of section 503(c)(1) of the act or any State law that prohibits the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample (or the offer
to sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample) is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $100,000.
In the 

Federal Register

 of May 26, 1993 (58 FR 30680), FDA published a proposed rule on procedures for administrative hearings on civil money
penalties, including penalties under PDMA. FDA published a correction to this proposal in the 

Federal Register

 of July 27, 1993 (58 FR 40103).


3. Rewards


Section 7 of PDMA (section 303(b)(5) of the act) provides that a person who provides information leading to the institution
of a criminal proceeding against, and conviction of, a person for the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample, or the
offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample in violation of section 503(c)(1) of the act, is entitled to one-half
of the criminal fine imposed and collected for such violation, but not more than $125,000. The proposed rule provides
in 203.70 that an application for such a reward be made to the Director, Office of Compliance, of the appropriate
Center.


H. Technical Amendment to State Licensing Guideline


FDA is proposing a technical amendment to the storage and handling requirements of the State licensing guideline
at 205.50(c) to clarify the agency's intention that the paragraph require that prescription drugs be stored
at appropriate temperatures in accordance with the requirements of the 22d edition of the U.S. Pharmacopoeia (U.S.P.
XXII), the current edition of that compendium.


III. Analysis of Impacts


FDA has examined the impacts of the proposed rule under Executive Order 12866 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act (Pub.
L. 96354). Executive Order 12866 directs agencies to assess all costs and benefits of available regulatory
alternatives and, when regulation is necessary, to select regulatory approaches that maximize net benefits (including
potential economic, environmental, public health and safety, and other advantages; distributive impacts; and
equity). The agency believes that this proposed rule is consistent with the principles set out in the Executive Order.
In addition, the proposed rule is not a significant regulatory action as defined by the Executive Order.
Most of the requirements in this proposed rule have already been implemented by the regulated industry in response
to PDMA's enactment, FDA's guidance, and industry trade associations' recommendations. 
The regulatory costs of this proposal, which are due to increased paperwork requirements, were calculated by multiplying
an estimate of the time necessary to complete the paperwork for each section by an hourly wage rate of $44.99. The agency
estimates that nonprofit health care organizations (hospitals and charitable organizations) will require roughly
76,100 hours to complete the paperwork, at a cost of just over $3.4 million (76,000 hours X $44.99) annually. Pharmaceutical
manufacturers and distributors will need about 476,000 hours to comply with the paperwork requirements, at a cost
of around $21.4 million (476,000 hours X $44.99) annually. In total, therefore, the industry will utilize 552,000
hours (76,000 + 476,000) and spend approximately $24.8 million (3.4 million + 21.4 million) to complete the paperwork
requirements. Further details for these estimates are included with the agency's paperwork reduction package,
prepared pursuant to the Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C. 3501 

et seq

.).
The Regulatory Flexibility Act requires agencies to analyze regulatory options that would minimize any significant
impact of a rule on small entities. Most of the requirements in this proposed rule have already been implemented by
the regulated industry, including small entities, in response to PDMA's enactment, FDA's guidance, and industry
trade association recommendations. Consequently, the agency certifies that the proposed rule will not have a significant
economic impact on a substantial number of small entities. Accordingly, under the Regulatory Flexibility Act, no
further analysis is required.


IV. Executive Order 12612: Federalism


Executive Order 12612 requires Federal agencies to examine carefully regulatory actions to determine if they would
have a significant impact on federalism. Using the criteria and principles set forth in the Order, the agency has considered
the impact of this proposed rule on the States, on their relationship with the Federal government, and on the distribution
of power and responsibilities among the various levels of government. 
FDA is publishing this proposed rule to set forth agency policies and requirements and provide administrative procedures,
information, and guidance for those sections of PDMA that are not related to State licensing of wholesale drug distributors.
Because enforcement of these sections of PDMA is a Federal responsibility, there should be little, if any, impact
on the States from this rule, if it is finalized.
FDA certifies that it has examined this proposed rule. Because it has little, if any, effect on federalism issues,
as stated above, and because any effects are not significant, this proposed rule does not require an assessment under
Executive Order 12612.


V. Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980


This proposed rule contains information collections which are subject to review by the Office of Management and Budget
(OMB) under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The title, description, and respondent description of the information
collection are shown below with an estimate of the annual reporting and recordkeeping burden. Included in the estimate
is the time for reviewing instructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,
and completing and reviewing the collection of information. 


Title

: Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987; Policies, Requirements, and Administrative Procedures. 


Description

: The information requirements contained in the proposed rule would collect information from establishments engaged
in the reimportation and wholesale distribution of drugs subject to section 503(b) of the act; the sale, purchase,
or trade (or offer to sell, purchase, or trade) of prescription drugs by hospitals, health care entities, and charitable
institutions; and the distribution of prescription drug samples. 


Description of Respondents

: Businesses, hospitals, health care entities, charitable institutions, and other for-profit and not-for-profit
organizations; small businesses or organizations.


<TABLE>





Estimated Annual Reporting and Recordkeeping Burden

1Section

1Annual number of 
respondents

1Annual frequency 

1Average burden per 
response 

1Annual burden hours




203.11 
12 
1 
30 min 
6.00
203.23(b), (c) 
44,469 
2 
15 min 
22,234.00
203.24 
44,469 
3 
20 min 
44,469.00
203.30(a), (b), (c) 
34,000 
120 
1 min 
68,000.00
203.31(a), (b), (c) 
34,000 
480 
1 min 
272,000.00
203.31(d) 
27,200 
1 
30 min 
13,600.00
203.31(e) 
4,700 
1 
1 min 
78.33
203.31(f) 
12 
1 
30 min 
6.00
203.34 
4,700 
1 
24 hrs 
112,800.00
203.37(a) 
48 
1 
30 min 
24.00
203.37(b) 
1,200 
1 
60 min 
1,200.00
203.37(c) 
2 
1 
30 min 
6.00
203.37(d) 
4,700 
1 
15 min 
1,175.00
203.39(a)(2)(i) 
6,800 
1 
15 min 
 1,700.00
203.39(b)(1), (2), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (12) 
300 
1 
3 hrs 
900.00
203.39(b)(11), (14) 
6,800 
1 
60 min 
6,800.00
203.50(a) 
125 
1 
30 min 
62.50
203.50(c) 
4,700 
1 
90 min 
7,050.00 

n,s


Total burden hours 
 
 


i0552,111.33

</TABLE>


The agency has submitted a copy of this proposed rule to OMB for its review of these information collections. Interested
persons are requested to send comments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information,
including suggestions for reducing the burden, to FDA's Dockets Management Branch (address above), and to the Office
of Information and Regulatory Affairs, OMB, rm. 3208, New Executive Office Bldg., Washington, DC 20503, Attn.: Desk
Officer for FDA. 


VI. Environmental Impact


The agency has determined under 21 CFR 25.24(a)(7) and (a)(8) that this action is of a type that does not individually
or cumulatively have a significant effect on the human environment. Therefore, neither an environmental assessment
nor an environmental impact statement is required.


VII. Request for Comments


Interested persons may, on or before May 30, 1994, submit to the Dockets Management Branch (address above) written
comments regarding this proposal. Two copies of any comments are to be submitted, except that individuals may submit
one copy. Comments are to be identified with the docket number found in brackets in the heading of this document. Received
comments may be seen in the office above between 9 a.m. and 4 p.m., Monday through Friday.


List of Subjects


21 CFR Part 203 


Drugs, Labeling, Manufacturing, Prescription drugs, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Warehouses.



21 CFR Part 205 


Intergovernmental relations, Prescription drugs, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Security measures,
Warehouses.
Therefore, under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and under authority delegated to the Commissioner of Food
and Drugs, it is proposed that Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations be amended as follows:
1. Part 203 is added to read as follows:


PART 203_PRESCRIPTION DRUG MARKETING


Subpart A_General Provisions


Sec.


203.1Scope.
203.2Purpose.
203.3Definitions.



Subpart B_Reimportation


203.10Restrictions on reimportation.
203.11Applications for reimportation to provide emergency medical care. 
203.12An appeal from an adverse decision by the district office. 


Subpart C_Sales Restrictions


203.20Sales restrictions. 
203.22Exclusions. 
203.23Revocation of acceptance and reshipment. 
203.24 Returns. 

 

Subpart D_Samples


203.30Sample distribution by mail or common carrier. 
203.31Sample distribution by means other than mail or common
carrier (direct delivery by a representative or detailer).
203.32Drug sample storage and handling requirements. 
203.33Drug sample forms.
203.34Policies and procedures; administrative systems.
203.35Standing requests.
203.36Fulfillment houses, shipping and mailing services,
comarketing agreements, and third party recordkeeping.
203.37Investigation and notification requirements.
203.38Sample lot or control numbers; labeling of sample units. 
203.39Donation of drug samples to charitable institutions.
203.40Retail pharmacists and drug samples.



Subpart E_Wholesale Distribution


203.50Requirements for wholesale distribution of prescription
drugs.



Subpart F_Request and Receipt Forms, Reports, and Records


203.60Request and receipt forms, reports, and records.
203.61Signatures.


Subpart G_Rewards


203.70Application for a reward.



Authority:

 Secs. 301, 303, 501, 502, 503, 510, 701, 704, 801 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 331, 333, 351,
352, 353, 360, 371, 374, 381).

 

Subpart A_General Provisions


203.1 

Scope.


This part sets forth procedures and requirements pertaining to the reimportation and wholesale distribution of
prescription drugs, including both bulk drug substances and finished dosage forms, and to the sale, purchase, or
trade (or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade) of prescription drugs, including bulk drug substances, by hospitals,
health care entities, and charitable institutions, and to the distribution of prescription drug samples. Blood
and blood components intended for transfusion are excluded from the restrictions in and the requirements of the Prescription
Drug Marketing Act of 1987 and the Prescription Drug Amendments of 1992.


203.2 

Purpose.


The purpose of this part is to implement the Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987 and the Prescription Drug Amendments
of 1992, except for those sections relating to State licensing of wholesale distributors (see part 205 of this chapter),
to protect the public health, and to protect the public against drug diversion by establishing procedures, requirements,
and minimum standards for the distribution of prescription drugs and prescription drug samples.


203.3 

Definitions.


(a) 

The act

 means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended (21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.). 
(b) Authorized distributor of record means a distributor with whom a manufacturer has established an ongoing relationship
to distribute such manufacturer's products. 
(c) 

Blood

 means whole blood collected from a single donor and processed either for transfusion or further manufacturing.
(d) 

Blood component

 means that part of a single-donor unit of blood separated by physical or mechanical means. 
(e) 

Bulk drug substance

 means any drug or drug component furnished in other than finished dosage form that is intended to furnish pharmacological
activity or other direct effect in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease, or to affect
the structure or any function of the body of humans.
(f) 

Charitable institution or charitable organization

 means a nonprofit hospital, health care entity, organization, institution, foundation, association, or corporation
that has been granted an exemption under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.
(g) 

Common control

 means the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person or an organization, whether
by ownership of stock, voting rights, by contract, or otherwise.
(h) 

Distribute

 means to sell, offer to sell, deliver, or offer to deliver a drug to a recipient, except that the term ``distribute''
does not include the providing of a drug sample to a patient by:
(1) A practitioner licensed to prescribe such drug; 
(2) A health care professional acting at the direction and under the supervision of such a practitioner; or 
(3) The pharmacy of a hospital or of another health care entity that is acting at the direction of such a practitioner
and that received such sample in accordance with the act and regulations. 
(i) 

Drug sample

 means a unit of a prescription drug that is not intended to be sold and is intended to promote the sale of the drug.
(j) 

Drug coupon

 means a form that may be redeemed, at no cost or at reduced cost, for a drug that is prescribed in accordance with section
503(b) of the act.
(k) 

Emergency medical reasons

 include, but are not limited to, transfers of a prescription drug between health care entities or from a health care
entity to a retail pharmacy to alleviate a temporary shortage of a prescription drug arising from delays in or interruption
of regular distribution schedules; sales to nearby emergency medical services, i.e., ambulance companies and fire
fighting organizations in the same State or same marketing or service area, or nearby licensed practitioners, of
drugs for use in the treatment of acutely ill or injured persons; provision of minimal emergency supplies of drugs
to nearby nursing homes for use in emergencies or during hours of the day when necessary drugs cannot be obtained; and
transfers of prescription drugs by a retail pharmacy to another retail pharmacy to alleviate a temporary shortage;
but do not include regular and systematic sales to licensed practitioners of prescription drugs that will be used
for routine office procedures.
(l) 

FDA

 means the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. 
(m) 

Group purchasing organization

 means any entity established, maintained, and operated for the purchase of prescription drugs for distribution
exclusively to its members with such membership consisting solely of hospitals and health care entities bound by
written contract with the entity.
(n) 

Health care entity

 means any person that provides diagnostic, medical, surgical, or dental treatment, or chronic or rehabilitative
care, but does not include any retail pharmacy or any wholesale distributor. A person cannot simultaneously be a ``health
care entity'' and a retail pharmacy or wholesale distributor.
(o) 

Licensed practitioner

 means any person licensed by State law to prescribe drugs.
(p) 

Manufacturer

 means any person who is a manufacturer as defined by 201.1 of this chapter.
(q) 

Nonprofit affiliate

 means any not-for-profit organization that is either associated with or a subsidiary of a charitable organization
as defined in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.
(r) 

Ongoing relationship

 means an association that exists when a manufacturer and a distributor enter into a written agreement under which
the distributor is authorized to sell the manufacturer's products for a period of time or for a number of shipments,
at least one sale is made under that agreement, and the name of the authorized distributor of record is entered on the
manufacturer's list of authorized distributors of record. 
(s) 

PDA

 means the Prescription Drug Amendments of 1992.
(t) 

PDMA

 means the Prescription Drug Marketing Act of 1987.
(u) 

Person

 includes any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.
(v) 

Prescription drug

 means any drug (including any biological product, except for blood and blood components intended for transfusion
or biological products which are also medical devices) required by Federal law (including Federal regulation) to
be dispensed only by a prescription, including finished dosage forms, bulk drug substances, and active ingredients
subject to section 503(b) of the act.
(w) 

Representative

 means an employee or agent of a drug manufacturer or distributor who promotes the sale of prescription drugs to licensed
practitioners and who may solicit or receive written requests for the delivery of drug samples. A detailer is a representative.
(x) 

Sample unit

 means a packet, card, blister pack, bottle, container, or other single package comprised of one or more dosage units
of a prescription drug sample, intended by the manufacturer or distributor to be distributed by a licensed practitioner
to a patient in an unbroken or unopened condition.
(y) 

Wholesale distribution

 means distribution of prescription drugs to persons other than a consumer or patient, but does not include:
(1) Intracompany sales; 
(2) The purchase or other acquisition by a hospital or other health care entity that is a member of a group purchasing
organization of a drug for its own use from the group purchasing organization or from other hospitals or health care
entities that are members of such organizations;
(3) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug by a charitable organization
to a nonprofit affiliate of the organization to the extent otherwise permitted by law;
(4) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug among hospitals or other health
care entities that are under common control; 
(5) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug for emergency medical reasons;

(6) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug under
a prescription executed in accordance with section 503(b) of the act; 
(7) The distribution of drug samples by manufacturers' and authorized distributors' representatives;
(8) The sale, purchase, or trade of blood or blood components intended for transfusion; 
(9) The reshipment of drugs, when conducted in accordance with 203.23;
(10) Drug returns, when conducted in accordance with 203.24; or 
(11) The sale of minimal quantities of drugs by retail pharmacies to licensed practitioners for office use. 
(z) 

Wholesale distributor

 means any person engaged in wholesale distribution of prescription drugs, including, but not limited to, manufacturers;
repackers; own-label distributors; private-label distributors; jobbers; brokers; warehouses, including manufacturers'
and distributors' warehouses, chain drug warehouses, and wholesale drug warehouses; independent wholesale drug
traders; and retail pharmacies that conduct wholesale distributions. 


Subpart B_Reimportation


203.10 

Restrictions on reimportation.


No prescription drug that was manufactured in a State and exported from the United States may be reimported by anyone
other than its manufacturer, except that FDA may grant permission to a person other than the manufacturer to reimport
a prescription drug if it deems such reimportation is required for emergency medical care. 


203.11 

Applications for reimportation to provide emergency
medical care.


(a) Applications for reimportation for emergency medical care are required to be submitted to the director of the
FDA District Office in the district where reimportation is sought (addresses found in 5.115 of this chapter).
(b) Applications for reimportation to provide emergency medical care will be reviewed and approved or disapproved
by each district office. 


203.12 

An appeal from an adverse decision by the district
 office.


An appeal from an adverse decision by the district office involving prescription human drugs other than biological
products may be made to the Office of Compliance (HFD300), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and
Drug Administration, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855. An appeal from an adverse decision by the district office
involving prescription human biological products may be made to the Office of Compliance (HFM600), Center
for Biologics Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 1401 Rockville Pike, Rockville, MD 20852.


Subpart C_Sales Restrictions


203.20 

Sales restrictions.


Except as provided in 203.22, 203.23, and 203.24, no person may sell, purchase, or trade, or offer to
sell, purchase, or trade, any prescription drug that was:
(a) Purchased by a public or private hospital or other health care entity; or
(b) Donated or supplied at a reduced price to a charitable organization.


203.22 

Exclusions.


Section 203.20 does not apply to:
(a) The purchase or other acquisition of a drug for its own use by a hospital or other health care entity that is a member
of a group purchasing organization from the group purchasing organization or from other hospitals or health care
entities that are members of the organization.
(b) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug by a charitable organization
to a nonprofit affiliate of the organization to the extent otherwise permitted by law.
(c) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug among hospitals or other health
care entities that are under common control. 
(d) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug for emergency medical reasons.

(e) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug under
a valid prescription.
(f) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug by hospitals or health care entities
owned or operated by Federal, State, or local governmental units to other hospitals or health care entities owned
or operated by Federal, State, or local governmental units.
(g) The sale, purchase, or trade of, or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade, blood or blood components intended for
transfusion.


203.23 

Revocation of acceptance and reshipment.


The revocation of a sale and purchase transaction by a hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution because
of a mistake in ordering or delivery and the reshipment of the prescription drug to a manufacturer or wholesale distributor
for a credit or refund are exempt from the prohibitions in 203.20, provided that:
(a) The hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution ships the drug back to the manufacturer or distributor
from which the drug was received within 10 working days of receipt;
(b) The reshipment is made under proper conditions for storage, handling, and shipping; and written documentation
showing that proper conditions were maintained is provided to the manufacturer or distributor to whom the drug is
reshipped;
(c) If reshipped to the wholesale distributor, the hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution provides
written notice to the manufacturer of the revocation and reshipment that includes the following information:
(1) The name and address of the hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution; 
(2) The name and address of the manufacturer and wholesale distributor;
(3) The product name and lot number; 
(4) The quantity involved in the revocation and reshipment; and 
(5) The date of the revocation and reshipment. 


203.24 

Returns. 


The return of a prescription drug purchased by a hospital or health care entity, or acquired at a reduced price by or
donated to a charitable institution, to the manufacturer or the wholesale distributor that sold, donated, or supplied
the prescription drug, is exempt from the prohibitions in 203.20, provided that:
(a) The hospital, health care entity, charitable institution, or wholesale distributor notifies the manufacturer
that the prescription drug product has been returned to the wholesale distributor;
(b) The hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution documents the return by filling out a credit memo
specifying:
(1) The name and address of the hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution; 
(2) The name and address of the manufacturer or wholesale distributor from which it was acquired; 
(3) The product name and lot or control number; 
(4) The quantity returned; and 
(5) The date of the return.
(c) The hospital, health care entity, or charitable institution forwards a copy of each credit memo to the manufacturer
and retains a copy of each credit memo for its records; 
(d) The value of any credit, refund, or exchange for the returned product does not exceed the purchase price or, if a
donation, the fair market price of the returned product; and
(e) Any drugs returned to a manufacturer or wholesale distributor are kept under proper conditions for storage, handling,
and shipping, and written documentation showing that proper conditions were maintained is provided to the manufacturer
or wholesale distributor to which the drugs are returned.


Subpart D_Samples


203.30 

Sample distribution by mail or common carrier.


(a) 

Requirements for drug sample distribution by mail or common carrier

. A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record may distribute a drug sample to a practitioner licensed to prescribe
the drug that is to be sampled, or, at the written request of a licensed practitioner, to the pharmacy of a hospital or
other health care entity, by mail or common carrier, provided that:
(1) The licensed practitioner executes and submits a written request to the manufacturer or authorized distributor
of record, as set forth in paragraph (b) of this section, before the delivery of the drug sample;
(2) The recipient executes a written receipt, as set forth in paragraph (c) of this section, when the drug sample is
delivered; and
(3) The recipient returns the receipt to the manufacturer or distributor from which the drug sample was received.

(b) 

Contents of the written request form for delivery of samples by mail or common carrier

. (1) A written request for a drug sample to be delivered by mail or common carrier to a licensed practitioner is required
to contain the following:
(i) The name, address, professional title, signature of the practitioner making the request; 
(ii) The practitioner's State license number or Drug Enforcement Administration identification number; 
(iii) The proprietary or established name and strength of the drug sample requested;
(iv) The quantity requested;
(v) The name of the manufacturer, and the authorized distributor of record, if the drug sample is requested from an
authorized distributor of record; and
(vi) The date of the request.
(2) A written request for a drug sample to be delivered by mail or common carrier to the pharmacy of a hospital or other
health care entity is required to contain, in addition to all of the information in paragraph (b)(1) of this section,
the name and address of the pharmacy of the hospital or other health care entity to which the drug sample is to be delivered.

(c) 

Contents of the receipt to be completed upon delivery of a drug sample

. The receipt is to be on a form designated by the manufacturer or distributor, and is required to contain the following:

(1) If the drug sample is delivered to the licensed practitioner who requested it, the receipt is required to contain
the name, address, professional title, and signature of the practitioner or the practitioner's designee who acknowledges
delivery of the drug sample; the proprietary or established name and strength of the drug sample, the quantity, and
the lot or control number of the drug sample delivered; and the date of the delivery. 
(2) If the drug sample is delivered to the pharmacy of a hospital or other health care entity at the request of a licensed
practitioner, the receipt is required to contain the name and address of the requesting licensed practitioner, the
name and address of the hospital or health care entity pharmacy designated to receive the drug sample; the name, address,
professional title, and signature of the person acknowledging delivery of the drug sample; the proprietary or established
name and strength of the drug sample, the quantity, and the lot or control number of the drug sample delivered; and the
date of the delivery. 


203.31 

Sample distribution by means other than mail or common
carrier (direct delivery by a representative or detailer).


(a) 

Requirements for drug sample distribution by means other than mail or common carrier

. A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record may distribute by means other than mail or common carrier, e.g.,
by a representative or detailer, a drug sample to a practitioner licensed to prescribe the drug to be sampled, or, at
the written request of such a licensed practitioner, to the pharmacy of a hospital or other health care entity, provided
that:
(1) The manufacturer or authorized distributor of record receives from the licensed practitioner a written request
signed by the licensed practitioner before the delivery of the drug sample;
(2) A receipt is signed by the recipient, as set forth in paragraph (c) of this section, when the drug sample is delivered;
(3) The receipt is returned to the manufacturer or distributor; and 
(4) The requirements of paragraphs (d) through (f) of this section are met.
(b) 

Contents of the written request forms for delivery of samples by a representative

. (1) A written request for delivery of a drug sample by a representative to a licensed practitioner is required to contain
the following: 
(i) The name, address, professional title, signature of the practitioner making the request; 
(ii) The practitioner's State license number or Drug Enforcement Administration identification number; 
(iii) The proprietary or established name and strength of the drug sample requested;
(iv) The quantity requested;
(v) The name of the manufacturer and the authorized distributor of record, if the drug sample is requested from an authorized
distributor of record; and 
(vi) The date of the request. 
(2) A written request for delivery of a drug sample by a representative to the pharmacy of a hospital or other health
care entity is required to contain, in addition to all of the information in paragraph (b) of this section, the name
and address of the pharmacy of the hospital or other health care entity to which the drug sample is to be delivered. 
(c) 

Contents of the receipt to be completed upon delivery of a drug sample

. The receipt is to be on a form designated by the manufacturer or distributor, and is required to contain the following:
(1) If the drug sample is received by the licensed practitioner who requested it, the receipt is required to contain
the name, address, professional title, and signature of the practitioner or the practitioner's designee who acknowledges
delivery of the drug sample; the proprietary or established name and strength of the drug sample, the quantity, and
the lot or control number of the drug sample delivered; and the date of the delivery. 
(2) If the drug sample is received by the pharmacy of a hospital or other health care entity at the request of a licensed
practitioner, the receipt is required to contain the name and address of the requesting licensed practitioner, the
name and address of the hospital or health care entity pharmacy designated to receive the drug sample; the name, address,
professional title, and signature of the person acknowledging delivery of the drug sample; the proprietary or established
name and strength of the drug sample, the quantity, and the lot or control number of the drug sample delivered; and the
date of the delivery. 
(d) 

Inventories of drug samples of manufacturers' and distributors' representatives

. Each drug manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that distributes drug samples by means of representatives
shall conduct, at least annually, a complete and accurate drug sample inventory, utilizing generally accepted inventory
practices. All drug samples in the possession or control of each manufacturer's and distributor's representatives
are required to be inventoried, and the results of the inventory are required to be recorded in an inventory record
and reconciliation report.
(1) The inventory record is required to identify all drug samples by the proprietary or established name and dosage
strength, and number of sample units of each drug sample in stock. 
(2) The reconciliation report is required to include: 
(i) A report of the physical count of the most recently completed prior inventory; 
(ii) A record of each drug sample shipment received since the most recently completed prior inventory, including
the sender and date of the shipment, and the proprietary or established name, dosage strength, and number of sample
units received; 
(iii) A record of drug sample distributions since the most recently completed inventory showing the name and address
of each recipient of each sample unit shipped, the date of the shipment, and the proprietary or established name, dosage
strength, lot or control number, and number of sample units shipped; and
(iv) An explanation for any significant loss. 
(3) The inventory and reconciliation reports shall be conducted and prepared by persons other than the representatives
being inventoried or supervisors or managers in their department, division, or branch, or in their direct line of
supervision or command.
(4) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record shall carefully evaluate any apparent discrepancy or significant
loss in its inventory and reconciliation, and shall fully investigate any such discrepancy or significant loss that
cannot be justified. 
(e) 

Lists of manufacturers' and distributors' representatives

. Each drug manufacturer or authorized distributor of record who distributes drug samples by means of representatives
shall maintain a list of the names and addresses of its representatives who distribute drug samples and of the sites
where drug samples are stored. 
(f) 

Notification if representative is convicted of violations

. Drug manufacturers or authorized distributors of record shall report to FDA any conviction of their representatives
for violations of section 503(c)(1) of the act or a State law because of the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample
or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample. 


203.32 

Drug sample storage and handling requirements. 


(a) 

Storage and handling conditions

. Manufacturers, authorized distributors of record, and their representatives shall store and handle all drug samples
under conditions that will maintain their stability, integrity, and effectiveness, and ensure that the drug samples
are free of contamination, deterioration, and adulteration.
(b) 

Compliance with compendial and labeling requirements

. A manufacturer, authorized distributor of record, and their representatives can generally comply with this section
by following the compendial and labeling requirements for storage and handling of a particular prescription drug
in handling samples of that drug. 


203.33 

Drug sample forms.


A sample request or receipt form may be delivered by mail, common carrier, or private courier or may be transmitted
photographically or electronically (i.e., by telephoto, wirephoto, radiophoto, facsimile transmission (FAX),
xerography, or electronic data transfer) or by any other system, provided that the method for transmission meets
the security requirements set forth in 203.60(d).


203.34 

Policies and procedures; administrative systems.


Each manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that distributes drug samples shall establish, maintain,
and adhere to written policies and procedures describing its administrative systems for the following: 
(a) Distributing drug samples by mail or common carrier, including methodology for reconciliation of requests and
receipts; 
(b) Distributing drug samples by means other than mail or common carrier including the methodology for their independent
sample distribution security and audit system;
(c) Conducting its inventory of drug samples under 203.31(d), including an inventory schedule;
(d) Auditing and detecting falsified or incomplete drug sample records;
(e) Identifying any significant loss of drug samples and notifying FDA of the loss;
(f) Monitoring any loss or theft of drug samples; and 
(g) Storing drug samples by representatives. 


203.35 

Standing requests.


Manufacturers or authorized distributors of record shall not distribute drug samples on the basis of open-ended
or standing requests, but shall require separate written requests for each drug sample or group of samples. An arrangement
by which a licensed practitioner requests in writing that a specified number of drug samples be delivered over a period
of not more than 6 months, with the actual delivery dates for parts of the order to be set by subsequent oral communication
or electronic transmission, is not considered to be a standing request.


203.36 

Fulfillment houses, shipping and mailing services,
comarketing agreements, and third party recordkeeping.


(a) 

Responsibility for creating and maintaining forms, reports, and records

. Any manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that uses a fulfillment house, shipping or mailing service,
or other third party, or engages in a comarketing agreement with another manufacturer or distributor to distribute
drug samples or to meet any of the requirements of PDMA, PDA, or this part, remains responsible for creating and maintaining
all requests, receipts, forms, reports, and records required under PDMA, PDA, and this part.
(b) 

Responsibility for producing requested forms, reports, or records

. A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that contracts with a third party to maintain some or all of its
records shall produce requested forms, reports, records, or other required documents within 48 hours of a request
by an authorized representative of FDA or another Federal, State, or local regulatory or law enforcement official.



203.37 

Investigation and notification requirements.


(a) Investigation of falsification of drug sample records. (1) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record
that has reason to believe that any person has falsified drug sample requests, receipts, or records shall conduct
a full and complete investigation, and shall notify FDA, by telephone or in writing, within 5 working days of becoming
aware of a falsification and within 5 working days of the completion of an investigation. 
(2) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record shall provide FDA with a complete written report, including
the reason for and the results of the investigation, not later than 30 days after the date of the initial notification.

(b) 

Significant loss or known theft of drug samples

. (1) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that distributes drug samples or a charitable institution
that receives donated drug samples from a licensed practitioner shall notify FDA, by telephone or in writing, within
5 working days of becoming aware of any significant loss or known theft of drug samples and within 5 working days of the
completion of an investigation into a report of a significant loss or known theft.
(2) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record shall provide FDA with a complete written report not later
than 30 days after the date of the initial notification.
(c) 

Conviction of a representative

. (1) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that distributes drug samples shall notify FDA, by telephone
or in writing, within 30 days of becoming aware of the conviction of one or more of its representatives for a violation
of section 503(c)(1) of the act or any State law involving the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample or the offer to
sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample. 
(2) A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record shall provide FDA with a complete written report not later
than 30 days after the date of the initial notification. 
(d) 

Selection of individual responsible for drug sample information

. A manufacturer or authorized distributor of record that distributes drug samples shall inform FDA in writing within
30 days of selecting the individual responsible for responding to a request for information about drug samples of
that individual's name, business address, and telephone number. 
(e) 

Whom to notify at FDA

. Notifications and reports concerning prescription human drugs shall be made to the Division of Drug Quality Evaluation
(HFD330), Office of Compliance, Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 7500
Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855. Notifications and reports concerning prescription human biological products
shall be made to the Division of Inspections and Surveillance (HFM650), Office of Compliance, Center for Biologics
Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, 1401 Rockville Pike, Rockville, MD 20852.


203.38 

Sample lot or control numbers; labeling of sample units. 


(a) 

Lot or control number required on drug sample labeling and sample unit label

. The manufacturer or authorized distributor of record of a drug sample shall include in the labeling of the drug sample
and the label of the sample unit an identifying lot or control number that will permit the tracking of the distribution
of each drug sample unit. 
(b) 

Lot or control number required on all drug sample distribution records

. All drug sample distribution records required under this part shall contain the lot or control number.
(c) 

Labels of sample units

. Each sample unit shall bear a label that clearly denotes its status as a drug sample, e.g., ``sample,'' ``not for sale,''
``professional courtesy package.''
(1) A drug that is labeled as a drug sample is deemed to be a drug sample within the meaning of the act.
(2) A drug product dosage unit that bears an imprint identifying the dosage form as a drug sample is deemed to be a drug
sample within the meaning of the act.
(3) Notwithstanding the above, any article that is a drug sample as defined in section 503(c)(1) of the act and 203.3(i)
that fails to bear the label required in this paragraph is a drug sample. 


203.39 

Donation of drug samples to charitable institutions.


(a) A charitable institution may receive a drug sample donated by a licensed practitioner for dispensing to a patient
of the charitable institution, provided that the charitable institution meets the conditions set forth in paragraph
(b) of this section; and
(1) The charitable institution is licensed by the State, if required by State law, and is otherwise in compliance with
State law; and
(2) The charitable institution has enrolled with FDA. A charitable institution is enrolled when it has notified the
FDA district office in which it is located (addresses found in 5.115 of this chapter) that it intends to solicit
and receive drug samples, has made application to the district office for a central file number, and has received such
a number.
(i) A person, partnership, or corporation that seeks to enroll with FDA as a charitable institution for the solicitation
and receipt of donated drug samples is required to provide the following information to the district office:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the person, partnership, or corporation seeking to enroll; and 
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the agent, employee, or other individual responsible for solicitations
and receipt of donated drug samples.
(ii) Once the required information has been provided, the district office will advise the applicant charitable institution
that it has been enrolled and issue the applicant a central file number.
(b) Each recipient charitable institution shall comply with the following procedures for receiving, holding, dispensing,
and distributing donated drug samples:
(1) A recipient charitable institution shall provide a written identification document to any employee or agent
authorized to act on behalf of the institution in soliciting or receiving donations of prescription drug samples.
The employee or agent identification document shall be valid for a limited term, but may be renewable.
(2) Each recipient charitable institution shall maintain a current listing of all agents or employees authorized
to solicit and receive drug samples on behalf of the institution. The listing shall include the name and telephone
number of the authorized agent or employee in charge of prescription drug sample solicitation, receipt, and redistribution.
(3) A drug sample donated by a licensed practitioner or donating charitable institution may be received by a charitable
institution only in its original, unopened packaging with its labeling intact. 
(4) Delivery of a donated drug sample to a recipient charitable institution may be completed by mail or common carrier,
collected by an authorized agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution, or personal delivery by a licensed
practitioner or an authorized agent or employee of the donating charitable institution. The licensed practitioner
or donating charitable institution shall place donated drug samples in a sealed carton for delivery to or collection
by the recipient institution.
(5) A donated drug sample may not be dispensed to a patient or be distributed to another charitable institution until
it has been examined by a licensed practitioner or registered pharmacist at the recipient charitable institution
to confirm that the donation record accurately describes the drug sample delivered and that no drug sample is adulterated
or misbranded for any reason, including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) The drug sample is out of date;
(ii) The labeling has become mutilated, obscured, or detached from the drug sample packaging;
(iii) The drug sample shows evidence of having been stored or shipped under conditions that might adversely affect
its stability, integrity, or effectiveness; 
(iv) The drug sample is for a prescription drug product that has been recalled or is no longer marketed; or 
(v) The drug sample is otherwise possibly contaminated, deteriorated, or adulterated. 
(6) The recipient charitable institution shall dispose of any drug sample found to be unsuitable by destroying it
or by returning it to the manufacturer. The charitable institution shall maintain complete records of the disposition
of all destroyed or returned drug samples. 
(7) If a donated drug sample is collected by an authorized agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution
or is personally delivered by a licensed practitioner or an authorized agent of a donating charitable institution,
the employee or agent of the recipient institution shall prepare at the time of collection or delivery a complete and
accurate donation record containing the information set forth in paragraph (b)(9) of this section, a copy of which
shall be retained by the recipient and by the donor.
(8) If the donated drug sample is transferred by mail or common carrier, the donor shall prepare a complete and accurate
donation record for any drug sample so transferred.
(i) The donor shall include a copy of the donation record with the drug sample shipment. 
(ii) An authorized agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution shall countersign the donation record,
return one copy to the donor, and retain one copy for the recipient's records. 
(9) The completed donation record is required to include the following information:
(i) The name, address, and telephone number of the licensed practitioner (or donating charitable institution);
and the practitioner's professional title and State license number or Drug Enforcement Administration identification
number; 
(ii) The manufacturer, brand name, quantity, and lot or control number of the drug sample donated; 
(iii) The date of the donation; 
(iv) The signature of the licensed practitioner making the donation (or the signature of the authorized agent of the
donating charitable institution); and 
(v) The signature of the authorized agent or employee of the recipient charitable institution.
(10) Each recipient charitable institution shall maintain complete and accurate records of donation, receipt,
inspection, inventory, dispensing, redistribution, destruction, and returns sufficient for complete accountability
and auditing of drug sample stocks.
(11) Each recipient charitable institution shall conduct an inventory of prescription drug sample stocks, at least
annually, utilizing independent inventory personnel, and shall prepare a report reconciling the results of each
inventory with the most immediate prior inventory. Drug sample inventory discrepancies and reconciliation problems
shall be investigated by the charitable institution and reported to FDA.
(12) A recipient charitable institution shall provide written certification to the licensed practitioner or donating
charitable institution that it is in conformity with all the requirements of this part before receiving any drug sample
donation. Such certification may be made part of the donation record.
(13) A recipient charitable institution shall store drug samples under conditions that will maintain the sample's
stability, integrity, and effectiveness, and will ensure that the drug samples will be free of contamination, deterioration,
and adulteration.
(14) A charitable institution shall notify FDA within 5 working days of becoming aware of a significant loss or known
theft of prescription drug samples.
(c) A charitable institution may donate drug samples to another recipient charitable institution for dispensing
to patients, provided that the recipient charitable institution meets the requirements set forth in paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this section.


203.40 

Retail pharmacists and drug samples.


The presence in a retail pharmacy of any drug sample shall be considered evidence that the drug sample was obtained
by the retail pharmacy in violation of section 503(c)(1) of the act. 


Subpart E_Wholesale Distribution


203.50 

Requirements for wholesale distribution of prescription drugs.


(a) 

Identifying statement for sales by unauthorized distributors

. Before the completion of any wholesale distribution by a wholesale distributor of a prescription drug for which
the seller is not an authorized distributor of record to another wholesale distributor or retail pharmacy, the seller
shall provide to the purchaser a statement identifying each prior sale, purchase, or trade of such drug. This identifying
statement shall include: 
(1) The proprietary and established name of the drug;
(2) Dosage;
(3) Container size;
(4) Number of containers;
(5) The drug's lot or control number(s);
(6) The business name and address of all parties to each prior transaction involving the drug, starting with the manufacturer;
and
(7) The date of each previous transaction.
(b) 

Identifying statement not required when additional manufacturing processes are completed

. A manufacturer that subjects a drug to any additional manufacturing processes to produce a different drug is not
required to provide to a purchaser a statement identifying the previous sales of the component drug or drugs.
(c) 

List of authorized distributors of record

. Each manufacturer shall maintain at the corporate offices a current written list of all authorized distributors
of record. 
(1) Each manufacturer's list of authorized distributors of record shall specify whether each distributor listed
thereon is authorized to distribute the manufacturer's full product line, or only particular, specified products.
(2) Each manufacturer shall update its list of authorized distributors of record on a continuing basis.
(3) Each manufacturer shall make its list of authorized distributors of record available on request to the public
for inspection or copying. A manufacturer may impose reasonable copying charges for such requests from members of
the public.


Subpart F_Request and Receipt Forms, Reports, and Records


203.60 

Request and receipt forms, reports, and records.


(a) 

Creation of request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents

. Request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents required by PDMA, PDA, and this part may be created
on paper or on electronic media. 
(b) 

Maintenance of request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents created on paper

. Request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents created on paper may be maintained on paper or by
photographic or electronic imaging, provided that the security and authentication requirements described in paragraph
(d) of this section are followed. 
(c) 

Maintenance of request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents created by electronic means

. Request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents created by means of electronic data entry and recordkeeping
equipment may be stored using computer technologies, provided that the security and authentication requirements
described in paragraph (d) of this section are followed.
(d) 

Security and authentication requirements for request and receipt forms, reports, records, and other documents

. A request or receipt form, report, record, or other document, and any signature appearing thereon, shall be created,
maintained, or transmitted in a form that provides reasonable assurance of being:
(1) Resistant to tampering, revision, modification, fraud, unauthorized use, or alteration; 
(2) Preserved in accessible and retrievable fashion; and 
(3) Visible or readily made visible to permit copying or other means of duplication for purposes of review, analysis,
verification, authentication, and reproduction by the person who executed the form or created the record, by the
manufacturer or distributor, and by authorized personnel of FDA and other regulatory and law enforcement agencies.
(e) 

Retention of request and receipt forms, reports, lists, records, and other documents

. (1) Any person required to create or maintain reports, lists, or other records under PDMA, PDA, or this part shall
retain them for at least 3 years after the date of their creation.
(2) Any person required to create or maintain reports, or records relating to the distribution of drug samples shall
retain them for at least 3 years after the date of their creation or 3 year after the date of expiration of a drug sample
for which the record is being kept, whichever is later.
(3) Any person required to create or maintain reports, or records relating to the distribution of drug samples shall
maintain a record of the distribution of drug samples that identifies the drugs distributed and the recipients of
the distributions and all drug samples destroyed or returned to the manufacturer. These records shall be maintained
for 3 years from the date on which they were created.
(f) 

Availability of request and receipt forms, reports, lists, and records

. Any person required to create or maintain request and receipt forms, reports, lists, or other records under PDMA,
PDA, or this part shall make them available upon request, in a form that permits copying or other means of duplication,
to FDA or other Federal, State, or local regulatory and law enforcement officials for review and reproduction. 


203.61 

Signatures.


(a) 

Signatures on request and receipt forms, reports, and records

. A verifiable signature on a request and receipt form, report, record, or other document shall be made by means of a
writing or marking instrument such as a pen, indelible pencil, or electronic stylus on electronic pad. Imprinting
or automatic reproduction of a signature by a device or machine (such as a stamp, copier, or autopen) is prohibited.

(b) 

Performance standards and special security requirements for signatures on electronic media

. If an electronic pad and stylus or other electronic medium is used to execute and record signatures, it shall be installed
and operated with:
(1) A system permitting visual review of the signature;
(2) An authentication system to detect or inhibit entry of a forged, traced, fraudulent, or counterfeit signature;
and 
(3) A locking mechanism that blocks alteration of documents or signatures after the signatures are made. 
(c) 

Signature surrogates

. [Reserved]


Subpart G_Rewards


203.70 

Application for a reward.


(a) 

Reward for providing information leading to the institution of a criminal proceeding against, and conviction of,
a person for the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample

. A person who provides information leading to the institution of a criminal proceeding against, and conviction of,
a person for the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample, or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample, in violation
of section 503(c)(1) of the act, is entitled to one-half the criminal fine imposed and collected for such violation,
but not more than $125,000.
(b) 

Procedure for making application for a reward for providing information leading to the institution of a criminal
proceeding against, and conviction of, a person for the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample

. A person who provides information leading to the institution of a criminal proceeding against, and conviction of,
a person for the sale, purchase, or trade of a drug sample, or the offer to sell, purchase, or trade a drug sample, in violation
of section 503(c)(1) of the act, may apply for a reward by making written application to: (1) Director, Office of Compliance
(HFD300), Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, 7500 Standish Pl., Rockville, MD 20855; or (2) Director,
Office of Compliance (HFM600), Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research, 1401 Rockville Pike, Rockville,
MD 20852, as appropriate.


PART 205_GUIDELINES FOR STATE LICENSING OF WHOLESALE PRESCRIPTION DRUG DISTRIBUTORS


2. The authority citation for 21 CFR part 205 continues to read as follows:





Authority: 

 Secs. 501, 502, 503, 701, 704 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 351, 352, 353, 371, 374).



3. Section 205.3 is amended by adding new paragraphs (f)(9), (f)(10), (f)(11), and (h) to read as follows: 



205.3 

Definitions. 


* * * * *


(f) ***
(9) The reshipment of drugs, when conducted in accordance with 203.23 of this chapter;
(10) Drug returns, when conducted in accordance with 203.24 of this chapter; or 
(11) The sale of minimal quantities of drugs by retail pharmacies to licensed practitioners for office use. 


* * * * * 


(h) Health care entity means any person that provides diagnostic, medical, surgical, or dental treatment, or chronic
or rehabilitative care, but does not include any retail pharmacy or any wholesale distributor. A person cannot simultaneously
be a ``health care entity'' and a retail pharmacy or wholesale distributor.
4. Section 205.50 is amended by revising the introductory text of paragraph (c) and paragraph (c)(1) to read as follow:




205.50 

Minimum requirements for the storage and handling of prescription drugs and for the establishment and maintenance
of prescription drug distribution records.


* * * * *


(c) 

Storage

. All prescription drugs shall be stored at appropriate temperatures and under appropriate conditions in accordance
with the requirements, if any, in the labeling of such drugs, or with the requirements in the U.S. Pharmacopeia XXII
(U.S.P. XXII), which is incorporated by reference in accordance with 5 U.S.C. 552(a) and 1 CFR part 51. Copies are available
from the U.S. Pharmacopeial Convention, Inc., 12601 Twinbrook Pkwy., Rockville, MD 20852, or available for inspection
at the Office of the Federal Register, 800 North Capitol St., NW., suite 700, Washington, DC.
(1) If no storage requirements are established for a prescription drug, the drug shall be held at ``controlled room
temperature'' as defined in U.S.P. XXII to help ensure that its identity, strength, quality, and purity are not adversely
affected.


* * * * *




Dated: March 1, 1994.

</SUPPLEM>
<SIGNER>
 Michael R. Taylor,

</SIGNER>
<SIGNJOB>
 Deputy Commissioner for Policy.

</SIGNJOB>
<FRFILING>
[FR Doc. 945540 Filed 31194; 8:45 am]

</FRFILING>
<BILLING>
BILLING CODE 416001F
</BILLING>





